[1001]
This hadith has been narrated by Ja'far b. Rabi' with the same chain of transmitters. And in the narration transmitted by 'Amr b. al-Harith (the words are): "When the Messenger of Allah (rtiay peace be upon him) prostrated, he spread out his arms so that the whiteness of his armpits was visible." And in the narration transmitted by al-Laith (the words are : "When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrated. he spread his hands from the armpits so that I saw their whiteness."
[1002]
Maimuna reported: When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrated himself, if a lamb wanted to pass between his arms, it could pass.
[1003]
Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrated himself, he spread his arms, i.e. he separated them so much that the whiteness of his armpits became visible from behind and when he sat (for Jalsa) he rested on his left thigh.
[1004]
Maimuna daughter of Harith reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrated, he kept his hands so much apart from each other that when it was seen from behind the armpits became visible. Waki' said: That is their whiteness.
[1005]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to begin prayer with takbir (saying Allih-o-Akbar) and the recitation: "Praise be to Allah, the Lord of the Universe." When he bowed he neither kept his head up nor bent it down, but kept it between these extremes; when he raised his bead after bow- ing he did not prostrate himself till he had stood erect; when he raised his head after prostration he did not prostrate himself again till he satup. At the end of every two rak'ahs he recited the tahiyya; and he used to place his left foot flat (on the ground) and raise up the right; he prohibited the devil's way of sitting on the heels, and he forbade people to spread out their arms like a wild beast. And he used to finish the prayer with the taslim.
[1006]
Musa b. Talha reported it on the authority of his father: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When one of you places in front of him so me. thing such as the back of a saddle, he should pray without caring who passes on the other side of it.
[1007]
Musa b. Talha reported on the authority of his father: We used to say prayer and the animals moved in front of us. We mentioned it to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: If anything equal to the back of a saddle is in front of you, then what walks in front, no harm would come to him. Ibn Numair said: No harm would come whosoever walks in front.
[1008]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about sutra of a worshipper; he said: Equal to the back of the saddle.
[1009]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked in the expedition of Tabuk about the sutra the worshipper; he said: Like the back of the saddle.
[1010]
Ibn Umar reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) went out on the 'Id day, he ordered to carry a spear-and it was fixed in front of him, and he said prayer towards its (direction), and the people were behind him. And he did it in the journey, and that is the reason why the Amirs carried it.
[1011]
Ibn Umar reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) set up (sutra), and Abu Bakr said: He implanted iron-tipped spear and said prayer towards its direction. Ibn Abu Shaiba made this addition to it: " Ubaidullah said that it was a spear."
[1012]
Ibn 'Umar said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to place his camel (towards the Ka'ba) and said prayer in its direction.
[1013]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say prayer towards his camel. Ibn Numair said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer towards the camel.
[1014]
Abu Juhaifa reported it on the authority of his father: I came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) in Mecca and he was (at that time) at al- Abtah in a red leather tent. And Bilal stepped out with ablution water for him. (And what was left out of that water) some of them got it (whereas others could not get it) and (those who got it) rubbed themselves with it. Then the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) stepped out with a red mantle on him and I was catching a glimpse of the whiteness of his shanks. The narrator said: He (the Holy Prophet) performed the ablution. and Bilal pronounced Adhan and I followed his mouth (as he turned) this side and that as he said on the right and the left: "Come to prayer, come to success."' A spear was then fixed for him (on the ground). He stepped forward and said two rak'ahs of Zuhr, while there passed in front of him a donkey and a dog, and these were not checked. He then said two rak'ahs of the 'Asr prayer, and he then continued saying two rak'ahs till he came back to Medina.
[1015]
Abu Juhaifa reported on the authority of his father: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (in Mecca at al-Abtah) in a red leather tent. and I saw Bilal take the ablution water (left by Allah's Messenger), and I saw the people racing, with one another to get that ablution water. If anyone got some of it, he rubbed himself with it, and anyone who did not get any got some of the moisture from his companion's hand. I then saw Bilal take a staff and fix it in the ground, after which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out quickly in a red mantle and led the people in two rak'ahs facing the staff, and I saw people and animals passing in front of the staff.
[1016]
'Aun b. Abu Juhaifa narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of his father a hadith like that of Sufyan, and 'Umar b. Abu Za'ida made this addition: Some of them tried to excel the others (in obtaining water), and in the hadith transmitted by Malik b. Mighwal (the words are): When it was noon, Bilal came out and summoned (people) to (noon) prayer.
[1017]
Abu Juhaifa reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went at noon towards al-Batha', he performed ablution, and said two rak'ahs of the Zuhr prayer and two of the 'Asr prayer, and there was a spear in front of him. Shu'ba said and Aun made this addition to it on the authority of his father Abu Juhaifa: And the woman and the donkey passed behind it.
[1018]
Shu'ba narrated the same on the basis of two authorities and in the hadith transmitted by Hakam (the words are) : The people began to get water that was left out of his (the Prophet's) ablution.
[1019]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I came riding on a she-ass, and I was on the threshold of maturity, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was leading people in prayer at Mina. I passed in front of the row and got down, and sent the she-ass for grazing and joined the row, and nobody made any objection to it.
[1020]
Abdullah b. Abbas reported that he came riding on a donkey, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was leading the people in prayer at Mina on the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage and (the narrator) reported: The donkey passed in front of the row and then he got down from it And joined the row along with the people.
[1021]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Uyaina on the authority of al-Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters and he reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was leading prayer at 'Arafa.
[1022]
This hadith has been reported by Ma'mar on the authority of al-Zuhri with the came chain of transmitters, but here no mention has been made of Mina or 'Arafa, and he said: It was in the Farewell Pilgrimage or on the Day of Victory.
[1023]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you prays he should not let anyone pass in front of him (if there is no sutra), and should try to turn him away as far as possible, but if he refuses to go, he should turn him away forcibly for he is a devil.
[1024]
Abu Salih al-Samman reported: I narrate to you what I heard and saw from Abu Sa'id al-Khudri: One day I was with Abu Sa'id and he was saying prayer on Friday turning to a thing which concealed him from the people when a young man from Banu Mu'ait came there and he tried to pass in front of him; he turned him back by striking his chest. He looked about but finding no other way to pass except in front of Abu Sa'id, made a second attempt. He (Abu Sa'id) turned him away by Striking his chest more vigorously than the first stroke. He stood up and had a scuffle with Abu Sa'id. Then the people gathered there He came out and went to Marwan and complained to him what had happened to him. Abu Sa'id too came to Marwan. Marwin said to him: What has happened to you and the son of your brother that he came to complain against you? Abu Sa'id said: I heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: When any one of you prays facing something which conceals him from people and anyone tries to pass in front of him, he should be turned away, but if he refuses, he should be forcibly restrained from it, for he is a devil.
[1025]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you prays, he should not allow anyone to pass before him, and if he refuses, he should be then forcibly resisted, for there is a devil with him.
[1026]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Umar by another chain of transmitters.
[1027]
Busr b Sa'id reported that Zaid b Khalid al-Juhani sent him to Abu Juhaim in order to ask him what he had heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with regard to the passer in front of the worshipper. Abu Juhaim reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone who passes in front of a man who is praying knew the responsibility he incurs, he would stand still forty (years) rather than to pass in front of him Abu Nadr said: I do not know whether he said forty days or months or years.
[1028]
This hadith has been narrated from Abu Juhaim Ansari by another chain of transmitters.
[1029]
Sahl b. Sa'd al-Si'idi reported: Between the place of worship where the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed and the wall, there was a gap through which a goat could pass.
[1030]
Salama b. Akwa' reported: He sought the place (in the mosque) where the copies of the Qur'an were kept and glorified Allah there, and the narrator made a mention that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sought that place and that was between the pulpit and the qibla-a place where a goat could pass.
[1031]
Yazid reported: Salama sought to say prayer near the pillar which was by that place where copies of the Qur'an were kept. I said to him: Abu Muslim. I see you striving to offer your prayer by this pillar. He said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seeking to pray by its side.
[1032]
Abu Dharr reported: The Messenger of 'Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you stands for prayer and there is a thing before him equal to the back of the saddle that covers him and in case there is not before him (a thing) equal to the back of the saddle, his prayer would be cut off by (passing of an) ass, woman, and black Dog.I said: O Abu Dharr, what feature is there in a black dog which distinguish it from the red dog and the yellow dog? He said: O, son of my brother, I asked the Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) as you are asking me, and he said: The black dog is a devil.
[1033]
This hadith has been transmitted by Humaid b. Hilal on the authority of Yunus.
[1034]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A woman, an ass and a dog disrupt the prayer, but something like the back of a saddle guards against that.
[1035]
'A'isha reported: The Prophet (may peace be upon him) used to pray at night while I lay interposed between him and the Qibla like a corpse on the bier.
[1036]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said his whole prayer (Tahajjud prayer) during the night while I lay between him and the Qibla. When he intended to say Witr (prayer) he awakened me and I too said witr (prayer).
[1037]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported: 'A'isha asked: What disrupts the prayer? We said: The woman and the ass. Upon this she remarked: Is the woman an ugly animal? I lay in front of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) like the bier of a corpse and he said prayer.
[1038]
Masruq reported: It was mentioned before'A'isha that prayer is invalidated (in case of passing) of a dog, an ass and a woman (before the worshipper, when he is not screened). Upon this 'A'isha said: You likened us to the asses and the dogs. By Allah I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying prayer while I lay on the bedstead interposing between him and the Qibla. When I felt the need, I did not like to wit to front (of the Holy Prophet) and perturb the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and quietly moved out from under its (i.e. of the bedstead) legs.
[1039]
Al-Aswad reported that 'A'isha said: You have made us equal to the dogs and the asses, whereas I lay on the bedstead and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came there and stood in the middle of the bedstead and said prayer. I did not like to take off the quilt from me (in that state), so I moved away quietly from the front legs of the bedstead and thus came out of the quilt.
[1040]
'A'isha reported: I was sleeping in front of the Mcsseinger ef Allah (may peace be upon him) with my legs between him and the Qibla. When he prostrated himself he pinched me and I drew up my legs, and when be stood up, I stretched them out. She said: At that time there were no lamps in the houses.
[1041]
Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer and I (lay) opposite to him while I was in menses. Sometimes his clothes touched me when he prostrated.
[1042]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer at night and I was by his side in a state of meanses and I had a sheet pulled over me a portion of which was on his side.
[1043]
Abu Huraira reported: An inquirer asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the prayer in a single garment. He (the Holy Prophet) add: Has everyone of you two garments?
[1044]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira with another chain of transmitters.
[1045]
Abu Huraira reported: A person addressed the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said to him: Can any one of us say prayer in one garment? He said: Do all of you possess two garments?
[1046]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: None of you must pray in a single garment of which no part comes over his shoulders.
[1047]
Umar b. Abu Salama reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) praying in Umm Salama's house in a single garment, placing its two ends over his shoulders.
[1048]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham b. 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters except (with this difference) that the word mutawashshihan was used and not the word mushtamilan .
[1049]
'Umar b. Abu Salama reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying prayer in the house of Umm Salama in a single garment with its extremities crossing each other.
[1050]
Umar b. Abu Salama reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) praying in a single garment with its ends crossing each other. 'Isa b. Hammad added: "placing on his shoulders".
[1051]
Jabir reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) praying in a single garment crossing the two ends.
[1052]
This hadith has been narrated by Sufyan with the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith transmitted by Numair the words are: I called upon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[1053]
Abu Zubair reported that he saw Jabir b. 'Abdullah praying in a single garment crossing Its ends even though he had the garments, and Jabir said: He saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) doing like this.
[1054]
Abu Sa'id al Khudri reported: I visited the Apostle (may peace be upon him) and saw him praying on a reed mat on which he was prostrating himself. And I saw him praying in a single garment with ends crossed with each other.
[1055]
This hadith has been narrated by A'mash with the came chain of transmitters, and in the narration of Abu Karaib the words are: "Placing its (mantle's) ends on his shoulders"; and the narration transmitted by Abu Bakr and Suwaid (the words are): "the ends crossing with each other".
[1056]
Abu Dharr reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, which mosque was set up first on the earth? He said: Al-Masjid al-Haram (the sacred). I (again) said: Then which next? He said: It was the Masjid Aqsa.I (again) said: How long the space of time (between their setting up)? He (the Holy Prophet) said: It was forty years. And whenever the time comes for prayer, pray there, for that is a mosque; and in the hadith transmitted by Abu Kamil (the words are): "Whenever time comes for prayer, pray, for that is a mosque (for you)."
[1057]
Ibrahim b. Yazid al-Tayml reported: I used to read the Qur'an with my father in the vestibule (before the door of the mosque). When I recited the ayat (verses) concerning prostration, he prostrated himself. I said to him: Father, do you prostrate yourself in the path? He said: I heard Abu Dharr saying: I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the mosque that was first set up on the earth. He said: Masjid Harim. I said: Then which next? He said: The Masjid al-Aqsa. I said: How long is the space of time between the two? He said: Forty years. He (then) further said: The earth is a mosque for you, so wherever you are at the time of prayer, pray there.
[1058]
Jabir b.'Abdullah al-Ansari reported: The Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: I have been conferred upon five (things) which were not granted to anyone before me(and these are): Every apostle wassent particularly to his own people,whereas I have been sent to all the red and the black the spoils of war have been made lawful for me, and these were never made lawful to anyone before me, and the earth has been made sacred and pure and mosque for me, so whenever the time of prayer comes for any one of you he should pray whenever he is,and I have been supported by awe (by which the enemy is overwhelmed) from the distance (which one takes) one month to cover and I have been granted intercession.
[1059]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah related that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said, and he related like this.
[1060]
Hudhaifa reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be npon him) said: We have been made to excel (other) people in three (things) : Our rows have been made like the rows of the angels and the whole earth has been made a mosque for us, and its dust has been made a purifier for us in case water is not available. And he mentioned another characteristic too
[1061]
Hudhaifa reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said like this.
[1062]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon hlmg) said: I have been given superiority over the other prophets in six respects: I have been given words which are concise but comprehensive in meaning; I have been helped by terror (in the hearts of enemies) : spoils have been made lawful to me: the earth has been made for me clean and a place of worship; I have been sent to all mankind and the line of prophets is closed with me.
[1063]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : I have been commissioned with words which are concise but comprehensive in meaning ; I have been helped by terror (in the hearts of enemies): and while I was asleep I was brought the keys of the treasures of the earth which were placed in my hand. And Abfi Huraira added: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has left (for his heavenly home) and you are now busy in getting them.
[1064]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying a hadith like that of Yunus.
[1065]
This hadith has been narratted by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[1066]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I have been helped by terror (in the heart of the enemy); I have been given words which are concise but comprehensive in meaning; and while I was asleep I was brought the keys of the treasures of the earth which were placed in my hand.
[1067]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: That is what Abu Huraira reported to us from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he narrated (some) ahadith one of which is that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I have been helped by terror (in the hearts of enemies) and I have been given words which are concise but comprehensive in meaning.
[1068]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to Medina and stayed in the upper part of Medina for fourteen nights with a tribe called Banu 'Amr b 'Auf. He then sent for the chiefs of Banu al-Najir, and they came with swords around their inecks. He (the narrator) said: I perceive as if I am seeing the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on his ride with Abu Bakr behind him and the chiefs of Banu al-Najjar around him till he alighted in the courtyard of Abu Ayyub. He (the narrator) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer when the time came for prayer, and he prayed in the fold of goats and sheep. He then ordered mosques to be built and sent for the chiefs of Banu al-Najjar, and they came (to him). He (the Holy Prophet) said to them: O Banu al-Najjar, sell these lands of yours to me. They said: No, by Allah. we would not demand their price, but (reward) from the Lord. Anas said: There (in these lands) were trees and graves of the polytheists, and ruins. The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) ordered that the trees should be cut, and the graves should be dug out, and the ruins should be levelled. The trees (were thus) placed in rows towards the qibla and the stones were set on both sides of the door, and (while building the mosque) they (the Companions) sang rajaz verses along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him):
O Allah: there is no good but the good of the next world, So help the Ansar and the Muhajirin.
[1069]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray in the folds of the sheep and goats before the mosque was built.
[1070]
Abu al-Tiyyah reported: I heard from Anas a narration like this from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1071]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: I said prayer with the Apostle (may peace be upon him) turning towards Bait-ul-Maqdis for sixteen months till this verse of Surah Baqara wis revealed: "And wherever you are turn your faces towards it" (ii. 144). This verse was revealed when the Apostle (may peace be upon him) had said prayer. A person amongst his people passed by the people of Ansar as they were engaged in prayer. He narrated to them (this command of Allah) and they turned their faces towards the Ka'ba.
[1072]
Abu Ishaq reported: I heard al-Bara' saying: We prayed with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (with our faces) towards Bait-ul-Maqdis for sixteen months or seventeen months. Then we were made to change (our direction) towards the Ka'ba.
[1073]
Ibn 'Umar reported: As the people were praying at Quba' a man came to them and said: It has been revealed to file Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the night and he has been directed to turn towards the Ka'ba. So turn towards it. Their faces were towards Syria and they turned round towards Ka'ba.
[1074]
Ibn 'Umar reported: As the people were engaged in the morning prayer a man came to them. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[1075]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray towards Bait-ul-Maqdis, that it was revealed (to him): "Indeed We see the turning of the face to heaven, wherefore We shall assuredly cause thee to turn towards Qibla which shall please thee. So turn thy face towards the sacred Mosque (Ka'ba)" (ii. 144). A person from Banu Salama was going; (he found the people) in ruk'u (while) praying the dawn prayer and they had said one rak'ah. He said in a loud voice: Listen ! the Qibla has been changed and they turned towards (the new) Qibla (Ka'ba) in that very state.
[1076]
'A'isha reported: Umm Habiba and Umm Salama made a mention before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) of a church which they had seen in Abyssinia and which had pictures in it. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When a pious person amongst them (among the religious groups) dies they build a place of worship on his grave, and then decorate it with such pictures. They would be the worst of creatures on the Day of judgment in the sight of Allah.
[1077]
'A'isha reported: They (some Companions of the Holy Prophet) were conversing with one another in the presence of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (during his last) illness. Umm Salama and Umm Habiba made a mention of the church and then (the hadith was) narrated.
[1078]
'A'isha reported: The wives of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be Upon him) made a mention of the church which they had seen in Abyssinia which was called Marya, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1079]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said during his illness from which he never recovered: Allah cursed the Jews and the Christians that they took the graves of their prophets as mosques. She ('A'isha) reported: Had it not been so, his (Prophet's) grave would have been in an open place, but it could not be due to the fear that it may not be taken as a mosque.
[1080]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let Allah destroy the Jews for they have taken the graves of their apostles as places of worship.
[1081]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let there be curse of Allah upon the Jews and the Christians for they have taken the graves of their apostles as places of worship.
[1082]
'A'isha and Abdullah reported: As the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was about to breathe his last, he drew his sheet upon his face and when he felt uneasy, he uncovered his face and said in that very state: Let there be curse upon the Jews and the Christians that they have taken the graves of their apostles as places of worship. He in fact warned (his men) against what they (the Jews and the Christians) did.
[1083]
Jundub reported: I heard from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) five days before his death and he said: I stand acquitted before Allah that I took any one of you as friend, for Allah has taken me as His friend, as he took Ibrahim as His friend. Had I taken any one of my Ummah as a friend, I would have taken Abu Bakr as a friend. Beware of those who preceded you and used to take the graves of their prophets and righteous men as places of worship, but you must not take graves as mosques; I forbid you to do that.
[1084]
Ubaidullah al-Khaulini reported: 'Uthman b. 'Affan listened to the opinion of the people (which was not favourable) when he rebuilt the mosque of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Thereupon he said: You have not been fair to me for I have heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: He who built a mosque for Allah, the Exalted, Allah would build for him a house in Paradise. Bukair said: I think he (the Holy Prophet) said: While he seeks the pleasure of Allah (by building the mosque). And in the narration of Ibn 'Isa (the words are): "(a house) like that (mosque) in Paradise."
[1085]
Mahmud b. Labid reported: When 'Uthman b. 'Affan intended to build the mosque (of the Prophet) the people did not approve of it. They liked that it should be kept in the same state. Thereupon he said: I heard the Messtnger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say : He who built a mosque for Allah, Allah would build a house for him like it in Paradise.
[1086]
Al-Aswad and 'Alqama reported: We came to the house of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud. He said: Have these people said prayer behind you? We said: No. He said: Then stand up and say prayer. He neither ordered us to say Adhan nor Iqama. We went to stand behind him. He caught hold of our hands and mode one of us stand on his right hand and the other on his left side. When we bowed, we placed our hands on our knees. He struck our hands and put his hands together, palm to palm, then put them between his thighs. When he completed the prayer he said. There would soon come your Amirs, who would defer prayers from their appointed time and would make such delay that a little time is left before sunset. So when you see them doing so, say prayer at its appointed time and then say prayer along with them as (Nafl), and when you are three, pray together (standing in one row), and when you are more than three, appoint one amongst you as your Imam. And when any one of you bows he must place his hands upon hie thighs and kneel down. and putting his palms together place (them within his thighs). I perceive as if I am seeing the gap between the fingers of the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him).
[1087]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Alqama and Aswad by another chain of transmitters and in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Mus-hir and Jabir the words are: "I perceive as if I am seeing the gap between the fingers of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was bowing."
[1088]
'Alqama and Aswad reported that they went to 'Abdullah. He said: Have (people) behind you said prayer? They said: Yes. He stood between them ('Alqama and Aswad). One was on his right aide and the other was on his left. We then bowed and placed our hands on our knees. He struck our hands and then putting his hands together, palm to palm, placed them between his thighs. When he completed the prayer he said: This is how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to do.
[1089]
Mus'ab b. Sa'd reported: I said prayer by the side of my father and placed my hands between my knees. My father said to me: Place your hands on your knees. I repeated that (the previous act) for the second time, and he struck at my hands and said: We have been forbidden to do so and have been commanded to place our palms on the knees.
[1090]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Ya'fur with the same chain of transmitters up to these words: We have been forbidden from it and no mention of that has been made what follows it.
[1091]
Ibn Sa'd reported: I bowed and my hands were in this state, i.e. they were put together, palm to palm, and were placed between his thighs. My father said: We used to do like this but were later on commanded to place them on the knees.
[1092]
Mus'ab b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported: I said prayer by the side of my father. When I bowed I intertwined my fingers and placed them between my knees. He struck my hands. When he completed the prayer he said: We used to do that but then were commanded to lift (our palms) to the knees.
[1093]
Tawus reported: We asked Ibn Abbas about sitting on one's buttocks (in prayer). (ala alqad mein)He said: It is sunnah. We said to him: We find it a sort of cruelty to the foot. Ibn 'Abbas said: It is the sunnah of your Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[1094]
Mu'awiya b. al-Hakam said: While I was praying with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), a man in the company sneezed. I said: Allah have mercy on you ! The people stared at me with disapproving looks, so I said: Woe be upon me, why is it that you stare at me ? They began to strike their hands on their thighs, and when I saw them urging me to observe silence (I became angry) but I said nothing. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said the prayer (and I declare that neither before him nor after him have I seen a leader who gave better instruction than he for whom I would give my father and mother as ransom).I swear that he did not scold, beat or revile me but said: Talking to persons is not fitting during the prayer, for it consists of glorifying Allah, declaring his Greatness. and recitation of the Qur'an or words to that effect. I said: Messenger of Allah. I was till recently a pagan, but Allah has brought Islam to us; among us there are men who have recourse to Kahins. He said, Do not have recourse to them. I said. There are men who take omens. That is something which they find in their breasts, but let it not turn their way (from freedom of action).I said: Among us there are men who draw lines. He said: There was a prophet who drew lines, so if they do it as they did, that is allowable.I had a maid-servant who tended goats by the side of Uhud and Jawwaniya. One day I happened to pass that way and found that a wolf had carried a goat from her flock. I am after all a man from the posterity of Adam. I felt sorry as they (human beings) feel sorry. So I slapped her. I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and felt (this act of mine) as something grievous I said: Messenger of Allah, should I not grant her freedom? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Bring her to me. So I brought her to him. He said to her: Where is Allah? She said: He is in the heaven. He said: Who am I? She said: Thou art the Messenger of Allah. He said: Grant her freedom, she is a believing woman.
[1095]
This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[1096]
Abdullah (b. Masu'd) reported: We used to greet the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while he was engaged in prayer and he would respond to our greeting. But when we returned from the Negus we greeted him and he did not respond to us; so we said: Messenger of Allah. we used to greet you when you were engaged in prayer and you would respond to us. He replied: Prayer demands whole attention.
[1097]
This hadith has been reported by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[1098]
Zaid b. Arqam reported: We used to talk while engaged in prayer and a person talked with a companion on his side in prayer till (this verse) was revealed: "And stand before Allah in devout obedience" (ii, 238) andwe were commanded to observe silence (in prayer) and were forbidden to speak.
[1099]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Isma'il b. Abu Khalid.
[1100]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent me on an errand. I (having done the business assigned to me came back and) joined him as he was going (on a ride). Qutaiba said that he was saying prayer while he rode. I greeted him. He gestured to me. When he completed the prayer. he called me and said: You greeted me just now while I was engaged in prayer. (Qutaiba said) : His (Prophet's face) was towards the east, as he was praying.
[1101]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent me (on an errand) while he was going to Banu Mustaliq. I came to him and he was engaged in prayer on the back of his camel. I talked to him and he gestured to me With his hand, and Zuhair gestured with his hand. I then again talked and he again (gestured to me with his hand). Zuhair pointed with his hand towards the ground. I heard him (the Holy Prophet) reciting the Qur'an and making a sign with his head. When he com- pleted the prayer he sa'id: What have you done (with regard to that business) for which I sent you? I could not talk with you but for the fact that I was engaged in prayer. Zuhair told that Abu Zubair was sitting with his face turned towards Qibla (as he transmitted this hadith). Abu Zuhair pointed towards Banu Mustaliq with his hand and the direction to which he pointed with his hand was not towards the Ka'ba.
[1102]
Jabir reported: We were in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he sent me on an errand, and when I came back (I saw him) saying prayer on his ride and his face was not turned towards Qibla. I greeted him but he did not respond to me. As he completed the prayer, he said : Nothing prevented me from responding to your greeting but the fact that I was praying.
[1103]
This hadith that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent Jabir on an errand has been reported by him through another chain of transmitters.
[1104]
Abu Huraira reported that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: A highly wicked one amongst the Jinn escaped yesternight to interrupt my prayer, but Allah gave me power over him, so I seized him and intended to tie him to one of the pillars of the mosque in order that you, all together or all, might look at him, but I remembered the supplication of my brother Sulaiman: "My Lord, forgive me, give me such a kingdom as will not be possible for anyone after me" (Qur'an, xxxvii. 35).
[1105]
This hadith has been transmitted by Ibn Abi Shaiba.
[1106]
Abu Darda' reported : Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up (to pray) and we heard him say: "I seek refuge in Allah from thee." Then said: " curse thee with Allah's curse" three times, then he stretched out his hand as though he was taking hold of something. When he finished the prayer, we said: Messenger of Allah, we heard you say something during the prayer which we have not heard you say before, and we saw you stretch out your hand. He replied : Allah's enemy Iblis came with a flame of fire to put it in my face, so I said three times: "I Seek refuge in Allah from thee." Then I said three times: "I curse thee with Allah's full curse." But he did not retreat (on any one of these) three occasions. Thereafter I meant to seize him. I swear by Allah that had it not been for the supplication of my brother Sulaiman he would have been bound, and made an object of sport for the children of Medina.
[1107]
Abu Qatadi reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying the prayer while he was carrying Umama, daughter of Zainab, daughter of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). and Abu'l-'As b. al-Rabi'. When he stood up, he took her up and when he prostrated he put her down,Yahya said: Malik replied in the affirmative.
[1108]
Abu Qatada al-Ansari reported: I saw the Apostle (may peace be upon him) leading the people in prayer with Umima, daughter of Abu'l-'As and Zainab, daughter of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), on his shoulder. When he bowed, he put her down, and when he got up after prostration, he lifted her again.
[1109]
Abu Qatada reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) leading the people in prayer with Umama daughter of Abu'l-'As on his neck; and when he prostrated he put her down.
[1110]
Abu Qatada reported : As we were sitting in the mosque, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us, and the rest of the hadith is the same except that he made no mention that he led people in this prayer.
[1111]
Abu Hazim is reported on the authority of his father: Some people came to Sahl b. Sa'd and began to differ about the wood of which the (Prophet's pulpit was made. He (Sahl b. Sa'd) said: By Allah, I know of which wood it is made and who made it, and the day when I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seated himself on it on the first day. I said to him: O Abu Abbas (kunyah of Sabl b. Sa'd), narrate to us (all these facts), He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent a person to a woman asking her to allow her slave, a carpenter, to work on woods (to prepare a pulpit) so that I should talk to the people (sitting on it). Abu Hazim said: He (Sahl b. Sa'd) pointed out the name of (that lady) that day. So he (the carpenter) made (a pulpit) with these three steps. Then the Messengerof Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded it to be placed here (where it is lying now). It was fashioned out of the wood of al-Ghaba. And I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) standing upon it and glorifying Allah and the people also glorified Allah after him, while he was on the pulpit. He then raised (his head from prostration) and stepped back (on his heels) till he prostrated himself at the base of pulpit, and then returned (to the former place and this movement of one or two steps continued) till the prayer was complete. He then turned towards the people and said: O people, I have done it so that you should follow me and learn (my mode of) prayer.
[1112]
Abu Hazim reported: They (the people) came to Sahl b. Sa'd and they asked him of what thing the pulpit of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was made, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1113]
Abu Huraira reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he forbade keeping one's hand on one's waist while praying, and in the narration of Abu Bakr (the words are): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade to do so.
[1114]
Mu'aiqib quoted the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) mentioning the removal of pebbles from the ground where he prostrated himself. He (the Prophet) said: It you must do so, do it only once.
[1115]
Mu'aiqib said: They asked the Apostle (may peace be upon him) about the removal of (pebbles) in prayer, whereupon he said: If you do it, do it only once.
[1116]
Abdullah b. Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw spittle on the wall towards Qibla, and scratched it away and then turning to the people said: When any one of you prays, he must not spit in front of him, for Allah is in front of him when he is engaged in prayer.
[1117]
Ibn Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw sputum sticking to the Qibla wall of the mosque, the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1118]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw sputum sticking to the Qibla of the mosque. He scratched it off with a pebble and then forbade spitting on the right side or in front, but (it is permissible) to spit on the left side or under the left foot.
[1119]
Abu Huraira and Abu Sa'id narrated that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw sputum, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1120]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may, peace be upon him) saw spittle or snot or sputum, sticking to the wall towards Qibla and scratched it off.
[1121]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw some sputum in the direction of the Qibla of the mosque. He turned towards people and said : How Is it that someone amongst you stands before his Lord and then spits out in front of Him? Does any one of you like that he should be made to stand in front of someone and then spit at his face? So when any one of you spits, he must spit on his left side under his foot. But if he does not find (space to spit) he should do like this. Qasim (one of the narrators) spat in his cloth and then folded it and rubbed it.
[1122]
Abu Huraira reported: I perceive as if I am looking at the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) folding up a part of his cloth with another one.
[1123]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you is engaged in prayer, he is holding intimate conversation with his Lord, so none of you must spit in front of him, or towards his right side, but towards his left side under his foot.
[1124]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Spitting in a mosque is a sin, and its expiation is that it should be buried.
[1125]
Shu'ba reported: I asked Qatada about spitting, in the mosque. He said: I heard Anas b. Malik say: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Spitting in the mosque is a sin, and its expiation is that it should be buried.
[1126]
Abu Dharr reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The deeds of my people, good and bad, were presented before me, and I found the removal of something objectionable from the road among their good deeds, and the sputum mucus left unburied in the mosque among their evil deeds.
[1127]
Abdullah b.Shakhkhir reported on the authority of his father that he said: I said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and saw him spitting and rubbing it off with his shoe.
[1128]
'Abdullah b. Shakhkhir narrated it on the authority of his father that he said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he spat and then rubbed it off with his left shoe.
[1129]
Sa'd b. Yazid reported: I said to Anas b. Malik: Did the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pray while putting on the shoes? He said: Yes.
[1130]
Sa'd b. Yazid Abu Mas'ama reported: I said to Anas like (that mentioned above).
[1131]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed in a garment which had designs over it, so he (the Holy Prophet) said: Take it to Abu Jahm and bring me a plain blanket from him,because its designs have distracted me.
[1132]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood for prayer with a garment which had designs over it. He looked at these designs and after completing the prayer said: Take this garment to Abu Jahm b. Hudhaifa and bring me a blanket for it has distracted me just now.
[1133]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) had a garment which had designs upon it and this distracted him in prayer. He gave it to Abu Jahm and took a plain garment in its place which is known anbijaniya.
[1134]
Anas b. Malik reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: When the supper is brought and the prayer begins, one, should first take food.
[1135]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the supper is brought before you, and it is also the time to say prayer, first take food before saying evening prayer and do not hasten (to prayer, leaving aside the food).
[1136]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas by another chain of transmitters.
[1137]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the supper is served to any one of you and the prayer also begins. (in such a case) first take supper, and do not make haste (for prayer) till you have (taken the food).
[1138]
A hadith like this has been narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Ibn 'Umar with another chain of transmitters.
[1139]
Ibn Atiq reported: Al-Qasim was in the presence of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) that I narrated a hadith and Qasim was a man who committed errors in (pronouncing words) and his mother was a freed slave-girl. 'A'isha said to him: What is the matter with you that you do not narrate as this son of my brother narrated (the ahaditb)? Well I know from where you picked it up. This is how his mother brought him up and how your mother brought you up. Qasim felt angry (on this remark of Hadrat 'A'isha) and showed bitterness towards her. When he saw that the table had been spread for 'A'isha, he stood up, 'A'isha, said: Where are you going? He said: (I am going) to say prayer. She said: Sit down (to take the food). He said: I must say prayer. She said: Sit down, ) faithless, for I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: No prayer can be (rightly said) when the food is there (before the worshipper), or when he is prompted by the call of nature.
[1140]
'Abdullah b. 'Atiq narrated from the Apostle (may peace be upon him) on the authority of 'A'isha, but he made no mention of the account of Qasim.
[1141]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said during the battle of Khaybar: He who ate of this plant, i.e. garlic, should not come to the mosques. In the narration of Zubair, there is only a mention of "battle" and not of Khaybar.
[1142]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenuer of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who eats of this (offensive) plant must not approach our mosque, till its odour dies: (plant signifies) garlic.
[1143]
Ibn Suhaib reported: Anas was asked about the garlic; he stated that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: He who eats of this plant (garlic) should not approach us and pray along with us.
[1144]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who eats of this plant (garlic) should not approach our mosque and should not harm us with the odour of garlic.
[1145]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade eating of onions and leek. When we were overpowered by a desire (to eat) we ate them. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: He who eats of this offensive plant must not approach our mosque, for the angels are harmed by the same things as men.
[1146]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who eats garlic or onion should remain away from us or from our mosque and stay in his house. A kettle was brought to him which had (cooked) vegetables in it, He smelt (offensive) odour in it. On asking he was informed of the vegetables (cooked in it). He said: Take it to such and such Companion. When he saw it, he also disliked eating it. (Upon this). he (the Holy Prophet) said: You may eat it, for I converse wkh one with whom you do not converse.
[1147]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) mying: He who eats of this (offensive) plant, i.e garlic, and sometirres he said: He who eats onion and garlic and leek, should not approach our mosque for the angels are harmed by the same things as the children of Adam.
[1148]
Ibn Juraij has narrated it with the same chain of transmitters: He who eats of this plant, i.e. garlic, should not come to us in our mosque, and he made no mention of onions or leek.
[1149]
Abu Sa'id reported: We made no transgression but Khaybar was conquered. We, the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), fell upon this plant. i e. garlic. because the people were hungry. We ate it to our heart's content and then made our way towards the mosque. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sensed its odour and he said: He who takes anything of this offensive plant must not approach us in the mosque. The people said: Its (use) has been forbidden; its (use) bu been forbidden. This reached the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: O people, I cannot forbid (the use of a thing) which Allah has made lawful, but (this garlic) is a plant the odour of which is repugnant to me.
[1150]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) along with his Companions happened to pass by a field in which onions were sown. The people stopped there and ate out of that, but some of them did not eat. Then they (Propbet's Companions) went to him. He (first) called those who had not eaten the onions and kept the others (who had taken onions) waiting till its odour vanished.
[1151]
Ma'dan b. Talha reported: 'Umar b. Khattab, delivered the Friday sermon and he made a mention of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr. He (further) said: I saw in a dream that a cock pecked me twice, and I perceive that my death is near. Some people have suggested me to appoint my successor. And Allah would not destroy His religion. His caliphate and that with which He sent His Apostle (may peace be upon him) If death approaches me soon, the (issue) of Caliphate (would be decided) by the consent of these six men with whom the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) remained well pleased till his death. And I know fully well that some people would blame me that I killed with these very hands of mine some persons who apparently professed (Islam). And if they do this (blame me) they are the enemies of Allah, and are non-believers and have gone astray. And I leave not after me anything which to my mind seems more important than Kalala. And I never turned towards the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (for guidance) more often than this Kalala, and he (the Holy Prophet) was not annoyed with me on any other (issue) than this: (And he was so perturbed) that he struck his fingers on my chest and said: Does this verse. that is at the end of Surat al-Nisa'. which was revealed in the hot season not suffice you? And if I live longer I would decide this (problem so clearly) that one who reads the Qur'an, or one who does not read it, would be able to take (correct),decisions (under its light). He ('Umar) further said: Allah ! I call You witness on these governors of lands, that I sent them to (the peoples of these lands) so that they should administer justice amongst them, teach them their religion and the Sunnah of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), and distribute amongst them the spoils of war and refer to me that which they find difficult to perform. O people. you eat 'these two plants and these are onions and garlic. and I find them nothing but repugnant for I saw that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sensed the odour of these two from a person in a mosque, he was made to go to al-Baqi'. So he who eats it should (make its odour) die by cooking it well.
[1152]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[1153]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone bears a man crying out in the mosque about something lie has lost, he should say: May Allah not restore it to you, for the mosques were not built for this.
[1154]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like this.
[1155]
Sulaiman b. Buraida narrated it on the authority of his father that a man cried out in the mosque saying: Who had called out for the red camel? Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: May it not be restored to you! The mosques are built for what they are meant.
[1156]
Sulaiman b. Buraida reported on the authority of his father that when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said prayer a man stood up and said: Who called for a red camel? (Upon this) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: May it not be restored to you! The mosques are built for what they are meant.
[1157]
Ibn Buraida narrated it on the authority of his father that a Bedouin came when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had completed the morning prayer. He thrust his head in the door of the mosque, and then the hadith (as narrated above) was narrated.
[1158]
This hadith has been reported by another chain of transmitters.
[1159]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you stands up to pray. the devil comes to him and confuses him to that he does not know how much he has prayed. If any one of you h" such an experience he should perform two prostrations while sitting down (in qa'da).
[1160]
This hadith has been narrated by al-Zubri with the same chain of transmitters.
[1161]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When there is a call to prayer the devil runs back breaking the wind so that he may not hear the call, and when the call is complete he comes back. And when the takbir is pronounced he again runs back, and when takbir is over he comes back and distracts a man saying: Remember such and such, remember such and such, referring to something the man did not have in his mind. with the result that he does not know how much he has prayed; so when any one of you is not sure how much he has prayed. he should perform two prostrations while sitting (qa'da).
[1162]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The devil takes to his heels breaking wind when the prayer begins. and the rest is the same but with this addition: "He (the devil) makes him think of pleasant things (or things productive of enjoyment) and of the things wished for, and reminds him of such needs which he had forgotten."
[1163]
'Abdullah b. Buhaina reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us two rak'ahs of prayer in one of the (obligatory) prayers and then got up and did not sit. and the people stood up along with him. When he finished the prayer and we expected him to pronounce salutation. he said: "Allah is Most Great" while sitting and made two prostrations before salutation and then pronounced (the, final) salutation.
[1164]
'Abdullah b. Buhaina al-Asadi, the ally of Abual-Muttalib, reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up in the noon prayer (though) he hadith sit (after the two rak'ahs). When he completed the prayer he performed two prostrations and said, "Allah is the Most Great" in each prostration, while he was sitting before pronouncing salutation, and the people performed prostration along with him. That was a compensation for he had forgotten to observe jalsa (after two rak'ahs).
[1165]
'Abdullah b. Malik ibn Buhaina al-Asadi reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up (at the end of two rak'ahs) when he had to sit and proceeded on with the prayer. But when he was at the end of the prayer, he performed a prostration before the salutation and then pronounced the salutation.
[1166]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you is in doubt about his prayer and he does Dot know how much he has prayed, three or four (rak'ahs). he should cast aside his doubt and base his prayer on what he is sure of. then perform two prostrations before giving salutations. If he has prayed five rak'ahs, they will make his prayer an even number for him, and if he has prayed exactly four, they will be humiliation for the devil.
[1167]
This hadith has been narrated by Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters and he said: He should perform two prostrations before the salutation, as it was mentioned by Sulaiman b. Bilal.
[1168]
'Alqama narrated It on the authority of 'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the prayer; (the narrator added): He made some act of omission or commission when he pronounced salutation; it was said to him: Messenger of Allah, is there something new about (he prayer? He (the Holy Prophet) said: What is it? They said: You said prayer in such and such away. He (the narrator) said: He (the Holy Prophet) turned his feet and faced the Qibla and performed two prostrations and then pronounced salutations, and then turned his face towards us and said: If there is anything new about prayer (new command from the Lord) I informed you of that. But I am a human being and I forget as you for. get, so when I forget, remind me, and when any one of you is in doubt about his prayer. he should aim at what Is correct. and complete his prayer in that respect and then make two prostrations.
[1169]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters, with a slight modification of words.
[1170]
This hadith is reported by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters, but with these words: "He should aim at correct (prayer) and it is advisable."
[1171]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters with the words: I, He should aim at what is correct and complete."
[1172]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters and said: "He should aim at correctness and that is right."
[1173]
This hadith has been reported by Mansur with the same chain of transwitters and he said: "He should aim at what is according to him correct."
[1174]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur and he said: "He should aim at correctness."
[1175]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said five rak'ahs of the noon prayer and when he completed the prayer, It was said to him: Has there been (commanded) an addition In prayer? He said: What is it? They said: You have said five rak'ahs, so he performed two prostrations.
[1176]
Alqama reported: He (the Holy Prophet) had led them five rak'ahs in prayer.
[1177]
Ibrahim b.Suwaid-reported: 'Alqama led us in the noon prayer and be offered five rak'ahs; when the prayer was complete, the people said to him: Abu Shibl, you have offered five rak'ahs. He said: No, I have not done that. They said: Yes (you said five rak'ahs). He (the narrator) said: And I was sitting in a corner among people and I was just a boy. I (also) said: Yes, you have offered five (rak'ahs). He said to me: O, one-eyed, do you say the same thing ? I said: Yes. Upon this he turned (his face) and performed two prostrations and then gave salutations, and then reported 'Abdullah as saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in prayer and offered five rak'ahs. And as he turned away the people began to whisper amongst themselves. He (the Holy Prophet) said: What is the matter with you ? They said: Has the prayer been extended? He said: No. They said: You have in fact said five rak'ahs. He (the Holy Prophet) then turned his back (and faced the Qibla) and performed two prostrations and then gave salutations and further said: Verily I am a human being like you, I forget just as you forget. Ibn Numair made this addition: "When any one of you forgets, he must perform two prostrations."
[1178]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us five (rak'ahs in prayer). We said: Messenger of Allah, has the prayer been extended? He said: What is the matter? They said: You have said five (rak'ahs). He (the Holy Prophet) said: Verily I am a human being like you. I remember as you remember and I forget just as you forget. He then performed two prostrations as (compensation of) forgetfulness.
[1179]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer and he omitted or committed (something). Ibrahim (one of the narrators of this hadith) said: It is my doubt, and it was said: Messenger of Allah, has there been any addition to the prayer? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Verily I am a human being like you. I forget just as you forget so when any one of you forgets, he must perform two prostrations, and he (the Holy Prophet) was sitting and then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned (his face towards the Qibla) and performed two prostrations.
[1180]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) performed two prostrations for forgetfulness after salutation and talking.
[1181]
Abdullah reported: We prayed along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) and he committed or omitted (something). Ibrahim said: By Allah, this is a misgiving of mine only. We said: Messenger of Allah, is there something new about the prayer ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: No. We told him about what he had done. He (the Holy Prophet) said : When a man commits or omits (something in prayer), he should perform two prostrations, and he then himself performed two prostrations.
[1182]
Ibn Sirin reported Abu Huraira as saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in one of the two evening prayers, Zuhr or 'Asr, and gave salutations after two rak'ahs and going towards a piece of wood which was placed to the direction of the Qibla in the mosque, leaned on it looking as if he were angry. Abu Bakr and Umar were among the people and they were too afraid to speak to him and the people came out in haste (saying) : The prayer has been shortened. But among them was a man called Dhu'I-Yadain who said: Messenger of Allah, has the prayer been shortened or have you forgotten ? The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) looked to the right and left and said: What was Dhu'I-Yadain saying? They said: He is right. You (the Holy Prophet) offered but two rak'ahs. lie offered two (more) rak'ahs and gave salutation, then said takbir and prostrated and lifted (his head) and then said takbir and prostrated, then said takbir and lifted (his head). He (the narrator) says: It has been reported to me by Imran b. Husain that he said : He (their) gave salutation.
[1183]
Abu Huraira reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in one of the evening prayers. And this hadith was narrated like one transmitted by Sufyan.
[1184]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in the 'Asr prayer and gave salutation after two rak'ahs. Dhu'l-Yadain (the possessor of long arms) stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, has the prayer been shortened or have you forgotten ? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Nothing like this has happened (neither the prayer has been shortened nor have I forgotten). He (Dhu'l-Yadain) said: Messenger of Allah, something has definitely happened. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned towards people and said: Is Dhu'l-Yadain true (in his assertion) ? They said : Messenger of Allah, he is true. Then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) completed the rest of the prayer. and then performed two prostrations while he was sitting after salutation.
[1185]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said two rak'ahs of the noon prayer and then gave salutation when a man from Band Sulaim came to him and said: Messenger of Allah. has the prayer been shortened, or have you forgotten ?-and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1186]
Abu Huraira reported : I offered with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) the noon prayer and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave salutation after two rak'ahs. A person from Bani Sulaim stood up, and the rest of the hadith was narrated as mentioned above.
[1187]
'Imran b. Husain reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the afternoon prayer and gave the salutation. at the end of three rak'ahs and then went into his house. A man called al-Khirbaq, who bad long aims, got up and went to him, and addressed him as Messenger of Allah and mentioned to him what he had done. He came out angrily trailing his mantle, and when he came to the people he said: Is this man telling the truth ? They said : Yes. He then said one rak'ah and then gave salutation and then performed two prostrations and then gave salutation.
[1188]
Imran b. Husain reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said three rak'ahs of the 'Asr prayer and then got up and went to his apartment. A man possessing large arms stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, bias the player been shortened ? He came out angrily, and said the rak'ah which he had omitted and then gave salutation. then performed two prostrations of forgetfulness and then gave salutation.
[1189]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while reciting the Qur'an recited its scarab containing sajda, and he performed prostration and we also prostrated along with him (but we were so overcrowded) that some of us could not find a place for our forehead (when prostrating ourselves).
[1190]
Ibn 'Umar reported: Sometimes the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited the Qur'an, and would pass by (recite) the verse of sajda and performed prostration and he did this along with us, but we were so crowded in his company that none of us could find a place for performing prostration. (and it was done on occasions) other than prayer.
[1191]
Abdullah (b. 'Umar) reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited (Surat) al Najm and performed prostration during its recital and all those who were along with him also prostrated themselves except one old man who took a handful of pebbles or dust in his palm and lifted it to his forehead and said: This is sufficient for me. 'Abdullah said: I saw that he was later killed in a state of unbelief.
[1192]
'ta' b. Yasar reported that he had asked Zaid b. Thabit about recital along with the Imam, to which he said: There should be no recital along with the Imam in anything, and alleged that he recited: "By the star when it sets"(Surah Najm) before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he did not prostrate himself.
[1193]
Abu Salama b. 'Abual-Rahman reported: Abu Huraira recited before them : "hen the heaven burst asunder" (al-Qur'an, lxxxiv. 1) and performed prostration. After completing (the prayer) he informed them that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has prostrated himself at it (this verse).
[1194]
A hadith like this has been narrated by AbuSalama on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[1195]
Abu Huraira reported: We performed prostration along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (as he recited these verses:) "When the heaven burst asunder" and "Read in the name of Thy Lord" (al-Qur'an, xcvi. 1).
[1196]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prostrated himself (while reciting these verses). "When the heaven burst asunder"; "Read in the name of Thy Lord".
[1197]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Abual-Rahman al-Araj on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[1198]
Abu Rafi' reported: I said the night prayer along with Abu Huraira and -as he recited: "When the heaven burst asunder," he performed prostration. Isaid to him: What prostration is this? He said: I prostrated myself (on this occasion of recital) behind Abu'I-Qasim (Muhammad. may peace be upon him), and Iwould go on doing this till I meet him (in the next world). Ibn 'Abu al-A'la said: (Abu Huraira uttered this:) I would not abandon performing prostration.
[1199]
This hadith has been narrated by Tamimi with the same chain of transmitters except for this that they made no mention of: "Behind Abu'l-Qasim" (may peace be upon him).
[1200]
Abu Rafi' reported: I saw Abu Huraira performing prostration (while reciting this verse:) "When the heaven burst asunder." I said to him: Do you prostrate yourself (while reciting) i? He said: Yes, I saw my best Friend (may peace be upon him) prostrating himself on (the recital of this verse) and I shall continue prostrating till I meet him. Shu'ba asked: Do you mean (by Friend) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes.
[1201]
Abdullah b. Zubair narrated on the authority of his father: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat in prayer. he placed the left foot between his thigh and shank and stretched the right foot and placed his left hand or his left knee and placed his right hand on his right thigh, and raised his finger.
[1202]
'Abdullah b. Zubair narrated on the authority of his father that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat for supplication, i.e. tashahhud (blessing and supplication), he placed his right hand on his right thigh and his left hand on his left thigh, and pointed with his forefinger , and placed his thumb on his (milddle) finger, and covered his knee with the palm of his left hand..
[1203]
Ibn 'Umar reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat for tashahhud he placed his left hand on his left knee. and his right hand on his right knee. and he raised his right finger, which is next to the thumb, making supplication in this way, and he stretched his left hand on his left knee. Another version on the authority of Ibn Umar says: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat for tashahhud, he placed his left hand on his left knee and placed his right hand on his right knee, and he formed a ring like (fifty-three) and pointed with his finger of attestation.
[1204]
'Ali b. 'Abual-Rahman al-Mu'awi reported: 'Abdullah b. Umar saw me playing with pebbles during prayer. After finishing the prayer he forbade me (to do it) and said: Do as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to do. I said: How did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) do? He said that he (the Messenger of Allah) sat at tashahhud, placed his right palm on the right thigh and closed all his fingers and pointed with the help of finger next to the thumb, and placed his left palm on his right thigh.
[1205]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[1206]
Abu Ma'mar reported: There was an Amir in Mecca who pronounced taslim twice. Abdullah said: Where did he get this sunnah? Al-Hakam said: There is a hadith to the effect that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did like It.
[1207]
'Abdullah reported: An Amir or a person pronounced taslim twice. 'Abdullah said: Where did he get this sunnah?
[1208]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be open him) pronouncing taslim on his right and on his left till I saw the whiteness of his cheek.
[1209]
Ibn 'Abbas said: We used to know that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished his prayer when we heard the takbir (Allah-O-Akbar).
[1210]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: We knew the finishing of the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) through takbir. 'Amr (b. Dinar) said: I made a mention of it to Abu Mas'ud. hue he rejected it and said: I never narrated it to you. 'Amr said: He did narrate it before this.
[1211]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: Dhikr (mentioning the name of Allah) in a loud voice after obligatory prayers was (a common practice) during the lifetime of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him); and when I heard that I came to knew that they (the people) had finished the prayer.
[1212]
'A'isha reported: The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) entered my house when a Jewess was with me and she was saying: Do you know that you would be put to trial in the grave? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) trembled (on hearing this) and said: It is the Jews only who would-be put to trial. 'A'isha said: We passed some nights and then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do you know that it has been revealed to me: "You would be put to trial in the grave"? 'A'isha said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seeking refuge from the torment of the grave after this.
[1213]
Abu Huraira reported. I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seeking refuge from the torment of the grave after this (after the revelation).
[1214]
'A'isha reported: There came to me two old women from the old Jewesses of Medina and said: The people of the grave are tormented in their graves. I contradicted them and I did not deem it proper to testify them. They went away and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me and I said to him: Messenger of Allah I there came to me two old women from the old Jewesses of Medina and asserted that the people of the graves would be tormented therein. He (the Prophet) said: They told the truth; they would be tormented (so much) that the animals would listen to it. She ('A'isha) said: Never did I see him (the Holy Prophet) afterwards but seeking refuge from the torment of the grave in prayer.
[1215]
Masruq reported this hadith on the authority of 'A'isha who said: Never did he (the Holy Prophet) say prayer after this in which I did not hear him seeking refuge from the torment of the grave.
[1216]
'A'isha reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seeking refuge from the trial of Dajjal (Antichrist) in prayer.
[1217]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: When any one of you utters tashahhud (in prayer) he must seek refuge with Allah from four (trials) and should thus say: "O Allah ! I seek refuge with Thee from the torment of the Hell, from the torment of the grave, from the trial of life and death and from the evil of the trial of Masih al-Dajjal" (Antichrist).
[1218]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to supplicate in prayer thus: "O Allah ! I seek refuge with Thee from the torment of the grave, and I seek refuge with Thee from the trial of the Masih al-Dajjal (Antichrist) and I seek refuge with Thee from the trial of life and death. O Allah ! I seek refuge with Thee from sin and debt." She ('A'isha) reported: Someone said to him -(the Holy Prophet) : Messenger of Allah ! why is it that you so often seek refuge from debt? He said : When a (person) incurs debt, (he is obliged) to tell lies and break promise.
[1219]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you completes the last tashahhud. he should seek refuge with Allah from four (trials). I.e. from the torment of Hell, from the torment of grave, from the trial of life and death.-and from the mischief of Masih at-Dajjal (Antichrist). This hadith has been narrated by al-Auza'i with the same chain of transmitters but with these words: "When any one of you completes the tashahhud" and he made no mention of the words "the last".
[1220]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah ! I seek refuge with Thee from the torment of the grave, and the torment of Hell, and the trial of life and death and the mischief of Masih al-Dajjal.
[1221]
Abu Huraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: Seek refuge with Allah from the torment of Hell, seek refuge with Allah from the torment of the grave, and seek refuge with Allah from the trial of Masih al-Dajjal and seek refuge with Allah from the trial of life and death.
[1222]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Ibn Tawus from his father on the authority of AbuHuraira.
[1223]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by A'raj on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[1224]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) use(t to seek refuge from the torment of the grave, torment of Hell and the trial of Dajjal.
[1225]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) used to teach them this supplication (in the same spirit) with which he used to teach them a surah of the Qur'an. He would thus instruct us: "Say, O Allah I we seek refuge with Thee from the torment of Hell, and I seek refuge with Thee from the torment of the grave, and I seek refuge with Thee from the trial of Masih al-Dajjal. and I seek refuge with Thee from the trial of life and death." Muslim b. Hajjaj said: It has reached me that Tawus said to his son: Did you make this supplication in prayer? He said: No. (Upon this) he (Tawus) said: Repeat the prayer. Tawus has narrated this hadith through three or four (transmitters) with words to the same effect.
[1226]
Thauban reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) finished his prayer. he begged forgiveness three times and said: O Allah ! Thou art Peace, and peace comes from Thee; Blessed art Thou, O Possessor of Glory and Honour. Walid reported: I said to Auza'i: How Is the seeking of forgiveness? He replied: You should say: ,I beg forgiveness from Allah, I beg forgiveness from Allah."
[1227]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced salutation, he salutation longer than it took him to say : O Allah: Thou art Peace, and peace comes from Thee, blessed art Thou, Possessor of Glory and ]Honour; and in the narration of Ibn Numair the words are: "O Possessor of Glory and Honour."
[1228]
Ibn Numair narrated it with the same chain of transmitters and said: O Possessor of Glory and Honour.
[1229]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Abdullah b. Harith on the authority of A'isha except for the words that he (the Holy Prophet) used to say: " 0 Possessor of Glory and Honour."
[1230]
Mughira b. Shu'ba wrote to Mu'awiya: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) finished the prayer and pronounced salutation he uttered (this supplication) : "There is no god but Allah. He is alone, Who has no partner. To Him belongs the sovereignty and to Him praise is due and He is Potent over every. thing. O Allah ! no one can withhold what Thou givest, or give what Thou withholdest, and the riches cannot avail a wealthy person with Thee."
[1231]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Mughira b. Shu'ba with another chain of transmitters. Abu Bakr and Abu Kuraib narrated in their narration (that Warrad reported): Mughira gave me dictation of it and I wrote it to Mu'awiya.
[1232]
Warrad, the freed slave of Mughira b. Shu'ba, reported: Mughira b. Shu'ba wrote to Mu'awiya (it was Warrad who wrote this letter for him, i.e. Mughira): I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: "When the salutation is pronounced." and the rest of the hadith is the same except this that he made no mention of: "He is Potent over everything."
[1233]
Warrad, the scribe of Mughira b. Shu'ba, reported: Mu'awiya wrote to Mughira (the contents) of the hadith as transmitted by Mansur and A'mash.
[1234]
Warrad, the scribe of Mughira b. Shu'ba, reported: Mu'awiya wrote to Mughira: Write to me anything which you heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). So he (Mughira) wrote to him (Mu'awiya): I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) uttering (these words) at the completion of prayer: "There is no god but Allah. He is alone and there is no partner with Him. Sovereignty belongs to Him and to Him is praise due and He is Potent over everything. O Allah ! no one can withhold what Thou givest, or give what Thou withholdest, and riches cannot avail a wealthy person with Thee."
[1235]
Abu Zubair reported: Ibn Zubair uttered at the end of every prayer after pronouncing salutation (these words): "There is no god but Allah. He is alone. There is no partner with Him. Sovereignty belongs to Him and He is Potent over everything. There is no might or power except with Allah. There is no god but Allah and we do not worship but Him alone. To Him belong all bounties, to Him belongs all Grace, and to Him is worthy praise accorded. There is no god but Allah, to Whom we are sincere in devotion, even though the unbelievers should disapprove it." (The narrator said): He (the Holy Prophet) uttered it at the end of every (obligatory) prayer.
[1236]
Abu Zubair reported: Abdullah b Zubair used to say La ilaha il-Allah at the end of every prayer like the hadith narrated by Ibn Numair and he reported it in the end, and then reported Ibn Zubair saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) uttered La ilaha il-Allah at the end of every prayer.
[1237]
Abu Zubair reported: I heard Abdullah b. Zubair addressing (people) on the pulpit and saying: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced salutation at the end of the prayer or prayers, and then he made a mention of the hadith as transmitted by Hisham b. 'Urwa.
[1238]
Abu Zubair al-Makki reported that he had heard 'Abdullah b. Zubair uttering (the words) like that of the hadith (narrated above) at the end of the prayer after pronouncing salutation. He at the conclusion also said that he was making a mention of that from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1239]
Abu Huraira reported: The poor amongst the emigrants came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: The possessors of great wealth have obtained the highest ranks and the lasting bliss. lie (the Holy Prophet) said: How Is that? They said: They pray as we pray, and they observe fast as we observe fast, and they give charity but we do not give charity, and they set slaves free but we do not set slaves free. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Shall A not teach you something by which you will catch upon those who have preceded you, and get ahead of those who come after you, only those who do as you do being more excellent than you? They said: Yes, Messenger of Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Extol Allah, declare His Greatness, and Praise Him thirty-three times after every prayer. Abu Salih said: The poor amongst the emigrants returned to the Messenger of Allah (may peace upon him) saying: Our brethren, the possessors, of property have heard what we have done and they did the same. So the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: This is Allah's Grace which He gives to whom He wishes. Sumayy reported: I made a mention of this hadith to some members of my family (and one of them) said: You have forgotten; he (the Holy Prophet) had said (like this):."Extol Allah thirty-three time. praise Allah thirty-three times and declare His Greatness thirty-three times. Ibn 'Ajjan said: I made a mention of this hadith to Raja' b. Haiwata and he narrated to me a hadith like this from AbuSalih from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[1240]
Abu Huraira narrated it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that they (the poor among the emigrants) said: Messenger of Allah, the possessors of great wealth have obtained the highest ranks and lasting bliss, and the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Qutaiba on the authority of Laith except that he inserted the words of Abu Salih in the narration of Abu Huraira that "the poor of the emigrants came back," to the end of the hadith,, but this addition was made that Suhail said (that every part of the supplication, i.e. Glorification of Allah, His Praise and declaration of His Greatness) should be uttered eleven times making the total as thirty-three.
[1241]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There are certain ejaculations, the repeaters of which or the performers of which after every prescribed prayer will never be caused disappointment: "Glory be to Allah " thirty-three times. "Praise be to Allah" thirty-three times, and "Allah is most Great" thirty-four times.
[1242]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There are certain ejaculations, the repeaters of which or the performers of which at the end of every prayer will never be caused disappointment: "Glory be to Allah" thirty-three times, "Praise be to Allah" thirty-three times, and "Allah is most Great" thirty-four times.
[1243]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : If anyone extols Allah after every prayer thirty-three times, and praises Allah thirty-three times, and declares His Greatness thirty-three times, ninety-nine times in all, and says to complete a hundred: "There is no god but Allah, having no partner with Him, to Him belongs sovereignty and to Him is praise due, and He is Potent over everything, " his sins will be forgiven even If these are as abundant as the foam of the sea.
[1244]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[1245]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to observe, silence for a short while between the takbir (at the time of opening the prayer) and the recitation of the Qur'an. I said to him: Messenger of Allah, for whom I would give my father and mother in ransom, what do you recite during your period of silence between the takbir and the recitation? He said: I say (these words): " O Allah , remove my sins from me as Thou hast removed the East from the West. O Allah purify me from sins as a white garment is purified from filth. O Allah !wash away my sins with water, snow and hall."
[1246]
Abu Huraira reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up for the second rak'ah he opened it with the recitation of the praise of Allah, the Lord of universe (al-Fatiha), and he did not observe silence (before the recitation of al-Fatiha).
[1247]
Anas reported: A man came panting and entered the row of worshippers and said : Praise be to Allah, much praised and blessed. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) finished the prayer he said: Who amongst you uttered these words? The people remained silent. He (the Holy Prophet again said)-: Who amongst you uttered these words? He said nothing wrong. Then a man said: I came and had a difficulty in breathing, so I uttered them. He replied: I saw twelve angels facing one another as to who will take them up (to Allah).
[1248]
Ibn 'Umar reported: While we said prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), one among the people said: Allah is truly Great, praise be to Allah in abundance. Glory be to Allah in the morning and the evening. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon, him) said: Who uttered such and such a word? A person among the people said: It is I, Messenger of Allah (who have recited these words). He (the Holy Prophet) said: It (its utterance) surprised me, for the doors of heaven were opened for It. Ibn 'Umar said: I have not abandoned them (these words) since I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying this.
[1249]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: When the Iqama has been pronounced for prayer, do not go running to it, but go walking in tranquillity and pray what you are in time for, and complete what you have missed.
[1250]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the words of Iqama are pronounced, do not come to (prayer) running, but go with tranquillity, and pray what you are in time for, and complete (what you have missed) for when one of you is preparing for prayer he is in fact engaged in prayer.
[1251]
Abu Huraira reported ahadith from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and one of them is that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon), said: When the call is made for prayer come to it walking with tranquillity, and pray what you are in time for, and complete what you have missed.
[1252]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the words of Iqama are pronounced, none of you should run to it (to join the prayer) but walk with tranquillity and dignity, and pray what you are in time for and complete what has gone before (what the Imam has completed).
[1253]
Abdullah b. Abu Qatada reported on the authority of his father: While we said our prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) he heard tumult. (At the end of the prayer) he (the Holy Prophet) said: What is the matter with you? They said: We hastened to prayer. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Don't do that; when you come for prayer, there should be tranquillity upon you. Pray (along with the Imam) what you can find and complete what preceded you.
[1254]
This hadith has been narrated by Shaiban with the same chain of transmitters
[1255]
Abu Qatada reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When the Iqama is pronounced do not get up till you see me Ibn Hatim was in doubt whether it was said: "When the Iqama is pronounced" or "When call is made".
[1256]
Abu Salama son of Abd al-Rahman b. Auf reported Abu Huraira as saying: Iqama was pronounced and we stood up and made rows straight till he (the Holy Prophet) stood at his place of worship (the place ahead of the rows where he stood to lead the prayer) before takbir tahrima. He reminded to (himself something) and went back saying that we should stand at our places and not leave them. We waited, till he came back to us and he had taken a bath and water trickled out of his head and then led us in prayer.
[1257]
Abu Salama reported Abu Huraira as saying: Iqama was pronounced. ant the people had formed themselves into rows. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out and stood at his place, and then pointed out with his hand that we should stand at our places. He then went away and took a bath and water trickled from his head and then led them in prayer.
[1258]
Abu Salama reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that when Iqama was pronounced for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), the people occupied their places in the rows before the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) stood up at his place.
[1259]
Jabir b. Samura reported: Bilal summoned to prayer as the sun declined but did not pronounce Iqama till the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out and the Iqama was pronounced on seeing him.
[1260]
Abu Huraira reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who finds a rak'ah of the prayer, he in fact finds the prayer.
[1261]
Abu Huraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who finds one rak'ah of the prayer with the Imam, he in fact finds the prayer.
[1262]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Malik and there is no mention of "along with the Imam" and In the hadith transmitted by Abdullah the words are: "he in fact finds the entire prayer".
[1263]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who finds one rak'ah at dawn before the rising of the sun, he in fact finds the dawn prayer. and he who finds one rak'ah of the afternoon prayer before sunset, he in fact finds the afternoon prayer.
[1264]
A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who finds a prostration before sunset or at dawn (prayer) before the rising (of the sun) he Id fact finds that (prayer), and prostration implies a rak'ah.
[1265]
This hadith is narrated by Abu Huraira with another chain of transmitters.
[1266]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who finds (gets) a rak'ah of the afternoon (prayer) before the setting of the sun, he in fact gets (the full prayer), and he who gets a rak'ah of the morning (prayer) before the rising of the sun he in fact gets (the full prayer).
[1267]
This hadith has been reported by Ma'mar with another chain of transmitters.
[1268]
Ibn Shibab reported: 'Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz deferred the afternoon prayer somewhat and 'Urwa said to him: Gabriel came down and he led the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in prayer. 'Umar said to him: O 'Urwa, are you aware of what you are saying? Upon this he ('Urwa) said: I heard Bashir b. Abu Mas'ud say that he heard Abu Mas'ud say that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Gabriel came down and acted as my Imam, then I prayed with him, then I prayed with him, then I prayed with him. then I prayed with him. then I prayed with him. reckoning with his fingers five times of prayer.
[1269]
Ibn Shibab reported: Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz one day deferred the prayer. 'Urwa b. Zubair came to him and informed him that one day as Mughira b. Shu'ba was in Kufa (as its governor), he deferred the prayer, Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari came to him and said: What is this, O Mughira? Did you know that it was Gabriel who came and said prayer and (then) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the prayer (along with him), then (Gabriel) prayed and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also prayed, then (Gabriel) prayed and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also prayed, then (Gabriel) prayed and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed (along with him). then Gabriel prayed and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also prayed (along with him) and then said: This is how I have been ordered to do. 'Umar (b. 'Abd al-'Aziz) said . O 'Urwa be mindful of what you are saying that Gabriel (peace be upon him) taught the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) the times of prayer. Upon this 'Urwa said: This is how Bashir b. Abu Mas'ud narrated on the authority of his father and (also said): 'A'isha?, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him). narrated it to me that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say the afternoon prayer, when the light of the sun was there in her apartment before it went out (of it).
[1270]
A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the afternoon" prayer as the sun shone in my apartment, and the afternoon shadow did not extend further. Abu Bakr said: The afternoon shadow did not appear to extend further.
[1271]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle (may peace be upon him), said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the afternoon prayer (at the time) when the sun shone in her apartment and its shadow did not extend beyond her apartment.
[1272]
A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the afternoon prayer (at a time) when the (light) of the sun was there in my apartment.
[1273]
Abdullah b. 'Amr reported the Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying: The time of the noon prayer(lasts)as long as it is not afternoon, and the time of the afternoon prayer (lasts) as long as the sun does not turn pale and the time of the evening prayer (lasts) as long as the spreading appearance of the redness above the horizon after sunset does not sink down, and the, time of the night prayer (lasts) by midnight and the time of the morning prayer (lasts) as long as the sun dots not rise.
[1274]
Abu Bakr b Abu Shaiban and Yahya b Abu Bukair both of them narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters.
[1275]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The time of the noon prayer is when the sun passes the meridian and a man's shadow is the same (length) as his height, (and it lasts) as long as the time for the afternoon prayer has not come; the time for the afternoon prayer is as long as the sun has not become pale ; the time of the evening prayer is as long as the twilight has not ended; the time of the night prayer is up to the middle of the average night and the time of the morning prayer is from the appearance of dawn, as long as the sun has not risen; but when the sun rises, refrain from prayer for it rises between the horns of the devil.
[1276]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about the times of prayers. He said: The time for the morning prayer (lasts) as long as the first visible part of the rising sun does not appear and the time of the noon prayer is when the sun declines from the zenith and there is not a time for the afternoon prayer and the time for the afternoon prayer is so long as the sun does not become pale and its first visible part does not set, and the time for the evening prayer is that when the sun disappears and (it lasts) till the twilight is no more and the time for the night prayer is up to the midnight.
[1277]
'Abdullah narrated it on the authority of his father Yahya: Knowledge cannot be acquired with sloth.
[1278]
Sulaiman b. Buraida narrated it on the authority of his father that a person asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the time of prayer. Upon this he said: Pray with us these two, meaning two days. When the sun passed the meridian. he gave command to Bilal who uttered the call to prayer. then lie commanded him and pronounced Iqama for noon prayer (Then at the tine of the afternoon prayer) he again commanded and Iqama for the afternoon prayer was pronounced when the sun was high, white and clear. He then commanded and Iqama for the evening prayer was pronounced, when the sun had set. He then commanded him and the Iqama for the night prayer was pronounced When the twilight had disappeared. He then commanded him and the Iqama for the morning prayer was pronounced, when the dawn had appeared. When it was the next day, he commanded him to delay the noon prayer till the extreme heat had passed and he did so, and he allowed it to be delayed till the extreme heat had passed. He observed the afternoon prayer when the sun was high, delaying it beyond the time he had previously observed it. He observed the evening prayer before the twilight had vanished ; he observed the night prayer when a third of the night had passed; and he observed the dawn prayer when there was clear daylight. He (the Holy Prophet) then said: Where is the man who inquired about the time of prayer? He (the inquirer) said : Messenger of Allah I here I am. He (the Holy Prophet) said: The time for your prayer is within the limits of what you have seen.
[1279]
Buraida narrated on the authority of his father that a man came to the Prophet (may peace be upon him) and asked about the times of prayer. He said: You observe with us the prayer. He commanded Bilal, and he uttered the call to prayer in the darkness of night preceding daybreak and he said the morning prayer till dawn had appeared. He then commanded him (Bilal) to call for the noon prayer when the sun had declined from the zenith. He then commanded him (Bilal) to call for the afternoon prayer when the sun was high. He then commanded him for the evening prayer when the sun had set. He then commanded him for the night prayer when the twilight had disappeared. Then on the next day he commanded him (to call for prayer) when there was light in the morning. He then commanded him (to call) for the noon prayer when the extreme heat was no more. He then commanded him for the afternoon prayer when the sun was bright and clear and yellowness did not blend with it. He then commanded him to observe the sunset prayer. He then commanded him for the night prayer when a third part of the night bad passed or a bit less than that. Harami (the narrator of this hadith) was in doubt about that part of the mentioned hadith which concerned the portion of the night. When it was dawn, he (the Holy Prophet) said: Where is the inquirer (who inquired about the times of prayer and added): Between (these two extremes) is the time for prayer.
[1280]
Abu Musa narrated on the authority of his father that a person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for inquiring about the times of prayers. He (the Holy Prophet) gave him no reply (because he wanted to explain to him the times by practically observing these prayers). He then said the morning player when it was daybreak, but the people could hardly recognise one another. He then commanded and the Iqama for the noon prayer was pronounced when the tan had passed the meridian and one would say that it was midday but he (the Holy Prophet) knew batter than them. He then again commanded and the Iqama for the afternoon prayer was pronounced when the sun was high. He then commanded and Iqama for the evening prayer was pronounced when the sun had sunk. He then commanded and Iqama for the night prayer was pronounced when the twilight had disappeared. He then delayed the morning prayer on the next day (so much so) that after returning from it one would say that the sun had risen or it was about to rise. He then delayed the noon prayer till it was near the time of afternoon prayer (as it was observed yesterday). He then delayed the afternoon prayer till one after returning from it would say that the sun had become red. He then delayed the evening prayer till the twilight was about to disappear. He then delayed the night prayer till it was one-third of the night. He then called the inquirer in the morning and said: The time for prayers is between these two extremes).
[1281]
Abu Musa reported on the authority of his father that an Inquirer came to the Prophet (may peace be upon him) and asked him about the times of prayers, and the rest of the hadith is the same (as narrated above) but for these words: "On the second day he (the Holy Prophet) observed the evening prayer before the disappearance of the twilight."
[1282]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) said: When it is very hot, say (the noon prayer) when the extreme beat passes away, for intensity of beat is from the exhalation of Hell.
[1283]
Another hadith like this has been transmitted by Abu Huraira.
[1284]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When it is a hot day, (delay) the prayer till the extreme heat passes away, for the intensity of heat is from the exhalation of Hell.
[1285]
Abu Huraira reported: Refrain from saying (the noon prayer) till the extreme heat passes away, for the Intensity of heat is from the exhalation of Hell.
[1286]
Abu Huraira narrated this hadith from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be up on him) by another chain of transmitters.
[1287]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: This heat is from the exhalation of Hell-fire, so delay the prayer till it is cool.
[1288]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira narrated to us from the Holy Prophet and he transmitted some ahadith-one of them was that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let the heat become less severe before prayer, for the intensity of heat is from the exhalation of Hell.
[1289]
Abu Dharr reported: The Mu'adhdbin (the announcer of the hour of prayer) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) called for the noon prayer. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let it cool down, let it cool down, or he said: Wait, wait for the intensity of heat is from the exhalation of Hell. When the heat is intense, delay the prayer till it becomes cooler. Abu Dharr said: (We waited) till we saw the shadow of the mounds.
[1290]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The Fire made a complaint before the Lord saying. "O Lord, some parts of mine have consumed the others." So it was allowed to take two exhalations, one exhalation in winter and the other exhalation in summer. That is why you find extreme heat (in summer) and extreme cold (in winter).
[1291]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When it is hot, make delay (in the noon prayer) till it cools down, for the intensity of beat is from the Exhalation of Hell; and lie also mentioned that the Hellfire complained to the Lord (about the congested atmosphere) and so it was permitted to take two exhalation during the whole year, one exhalation during the winter and one exhalation during the summer.
[1292]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The Fire said to the Lord: O Lord! some parts of mine have consumed the others, so allow me to exhale (in order to find some relief from this congestion). It was granted permission to take two exhalations, one exhalation during the winter and the other exhalation during the summer So whatever you perceive in the form of intense cold or hurting cold is from the exhalation of Hell. And whatever you perceive in the form of extreme heat or intense beat is from the exhalation of Hell.
[1293]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to offer the noon prayer when the sun declined.
[1294]
Khabbab reported: We complained to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (the difficulty of) saying prayer on the intensely heated (ground or sand), but he paid no heed to our complaint.
[1295]
Khabbab reported: We came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and we complained to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about (saying prayer) on the extremely heated ground (or sand), but he paid no heed to us. Zuhair said: I asked Abu Ishaq whether it was about the noon prayer. He said: Yes. I again said whether it concerned the (offering) of the noon (prayer) in earlier hours. He said: Yes. I said: Did it concern expediting it? He said: Yes.
[1296]
Anas b. Malik reported: We used to say (the noonprayer) with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the intense heat, but when someone amongst us found it hard to place his forehead on the ground, he spread his cloth and prostrated on it.
[1297]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray the afternoon prayer when the sun was high and bright, then one would go off to al-'Awali and get there while the sun was still high. Ibn Qutaiba made no mention of "one would go off to al-'Awali".
[1298]
This hadith that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to offer the afternoon prayer like the one narrated above has been transmitted by Anas b. Malik by another chain of transmitters.
[1299]
Anas b. Malik reported: We used to offer the 'Asr prayer, then one would go to Quba' and reach there and the sun would be still high.
[1300]
Anas b. Malik reported: We used to offer the afternoon prayer (at such a time) that a person would go to Bani 'Amr b. Auf and he would find them busy offering the afternoon prayer.
[1301]
'Ala' b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported that they came to the house of Anas b. Malik in Basra after saying the noon prayer. His (Anas) house was situated by the side of the mosque. As revisited him he (Anas) said: Have you said the afternoon prayer? We said to him: It is just a few minutes before that we finished the noon prayer. He said: Offer the afternoon prayer. So we stood up and said our prayer. And when we completed it, he said: I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: This is how the hypocrite prays: he sits watching the sun, and when it is between the horns of devil, he rises and strikes the ground four times (in haste) mentioning Allah a little during it.
[1302]
Abu Umama b. Sahl reported: We offered the noon prayer with Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz. We then set out till we came to Anas b. Malik and found him busy in saying the afternoon prayer. I said to him: O uncle! which is this prayer that you are offering? He said: It is the afternoon prayer and this is the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that we offered along with him.
[1303]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in the afternoon prayer. When he completed it, a person from Bani Salama came to him and said: Messenger of Allah, we intend to slaughter our came and we are desirous that you should also be present there (on this occasion). He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes. He (the person) went and we also went along with him and we found that the camel had not been slaughtered yet. Then it was slaughtered, and it was cut into pieces and then some of those were cooked, and then we ate (them) before the setting of the sun. This hadith has also been narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[1304]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported: We used to say the afternoon prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and then the camel was slaughtered and ten parts of it were distributed; then it was cooked and then we ate this cooked meat before the sinking of the sun.
[1305]
This hadith has been reported by 'Auza'i with the same chain of transmitters: We used to slaughter the camel during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) after the 'Asr prayer, but he made no mention of: "We used to pray along with him."
[1306]
Ibn Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who misses the afternoon prayer, it is as though he has been deprived of his family and his property.
[1307]
This hadith has been narrated as Marfu by another chain of transmitters.
[1308]
Abdullah relates on the authority of his father. He who missed his afternoon prayer it is as though he was deprived of his family and property.
[1309]
'Ali reported: When it was the day (of the Battle) of Ahzab, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: May Allah fill their graves and houses with fire, as they detained us and diverted us from the middle prayer, till the sun set.
[1310]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[1311]
'Ali reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: On the day (of the Battle) of Ahzab we were diverted from the middle prayer, till the sun set. May Allah fill their graves or their houses, or their stomachs with fire. The narrator is in doubt about "houses" and "stomachs".
[1312]
This hadith has heed narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters. And he said: Their houses and their graves (be filled with fire), and did not express doubt over the words, "houses" and "graves".
[1313]
Yahya heard 'Ali saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said on the day (of the Battle) of Ahzab, while sitting in one of the openings of the ditch: They (the enemies) have diverted us from the middle prayer till the sun set. May Allah fill their graves and their houses with fire, or their graves and stomachs with fire.
[1314]
'Ali reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said on the day (of the Battle) of Ahzab: They diverted us from saying the middle prayer, i.e. the 'Asr prayer. May Allah fill their houses and graves with fire; he then observed this prayer between the evening prayer and the night prayer.
[1315]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported that the polytheists detained the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) from observing the afternoon prayer till the sun became red or it became yellow. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: They have diverted us from (offering) the middle prayer. i.e. the 'Asr prayer. May Allah fill their bellies and their graves with fire, or he said: May Allah stuff their bellies and their graves with fire.
[1316]
Abu Yunus, the freed slave of 'A'isha said: 'A'isha ordered me to transcribe a copy of the Qur'an for her and said: When you reach this verse: "Guard the prayers and the middle prayer" (ii. 238), inform me; so when I reached it, I informed her and she gave me dictation (like this): Guard the prayers and the middle prayer and the afternoon prayer, and stand up truly obedient to Allah. 'A'isha said: This is how I have heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1317]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: This verse was revealed (in this way): "Guard the prayers and the 'Asr prayer." We recited it (in this very way) so long as Allah desired. Allah, then, abrogated it and it was revealed: "Guard the prayers, and the middle prayer." A person who was sitting with Shaqiq (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) said: Now it implies the 'Asr prayer. Upon this al-Bara' said: I have already informed you how this (verse) was revealed and how Allah abrogated it, and Allah knows best. Imam Muslim said: Ashja'i narrated it from Sufyan al-Thauri, who narrated it from al-Aswad b. Qais, who narrated it from 'Uqba, who narrated it from al-Bara' b. 'Azib who said: We recited with the Prophet (may peace be upon him) (the above-mentioned verse like this, i.e. instead of Salat al- Wusta, Salat al-'Asr) for a certain period. as It has been mentioned (in the above-quoted hadith).
[1318]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Umar b. al-Khattab had been cursing the pagans of the Quraish an the day (of the Battle) of Khandaq (Ditch). (He came to the Holy Prophet) and said: Messenger of Allah, by God, I could not say. the 'Asr prayer till the sun set. Upon this the Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: By Allah I, too, have not observed it. So we went to a valley. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) performed ablution and we too performed ablution, and then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said the 'Asr prayer after the sun had set. and then said the evening prayer after it.
[1319]
This hadith has been reported by Yahya b. Abd Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[1320]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Angels take turns among you by night and by day, and they all assemble at the dawn and afternoon prayers. Those (of the angels) who spend the night among you, then, ascend, and their Lord asks them, though He is the best informed about them : How did you leave My servants? -they say: We left them while they were praying and we came to them while they were praying.
[1321]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Angels take turns among you by night and by day, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1322]
Jarir b. Abdullah is reported to have said: We were sitting with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he looked at the full moon and observed: You shall see your Lord as you are seeing this moon, and you will not be harmed by seeing Him. So if you can, do not let -yourselves be overpowered in case of prayer observed before the rising of the sun and its setting, i.e. the 'Asr prayer and the morning prayer. Jarir then recited it: "Celebrate the praise of thy Lord before the rising of the sun and before Its setting" (xx. 130).
[1323]
Waki' reported (this hadith) with the same chain of transmitters (that the Holy Prophet) said: You will be soon presented before your Lord, and you will see Him as you are seeing this moon, and then recited (the above-mentioned verse). But (in this hadith) no mention is made of Jarir.
[1324]
'Umara b. Ruwaiba is reported to have said on the authority of his father: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: He who observed prayer before the rising of the son and its setting, i. e. the dawn prayer and the afternoon prayer, would not cater the (Hell) fire. A person belonging to Basra said to him : Did you yourself bear it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes. The person (from Basra) said: I bear witness that I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him); my ears heard it and my heart retained it.
[1325]
Umara b. Ruwaiba reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who said prayer before the rising of the sun and its setting would not enter the fire (of Hell), and there was a man from Basra (sitting) beside him who said: Did you hear it from the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him)? He said: Yes, I bear witness to it. The man from Basra said: I bear witness that I did hear from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying it from the place that you heard from him.
[1326]
Abu Bakr reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who observed two prayers at two cool (hours) would enter Paradise.
[1327]
This hadith has been narrated by the same chain of transmitters by Hammam, and said about Abu Bakr that he was Ibn Abu Musa.
[1328]
Salama b. al-Akwa' reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say the evening prayer when the sun had set and disappeared (behind the horizon).
[1329]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported: We used to observe the evening prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and then one of us would go away and he could see the (distant) place where his arrow would fall.
[1330]
A hadith like this, i.e. "We used to observe evening prayer ...." so on and so forth, has been narrated by Rafi' b. Khadij by another chain of transmitters.
[1331]
'A'isha. the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) deferred one night the 'Isya' prayer. And this is called 'Atama. And the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come out till Umar b. Khattab told (him) that the women and children had gone to sleep. So the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out towards them and said to the people of the mosque: None except you from the people of the earth waits for it (for the night prayer at this late hour), and it was before Islam had spread amongst people. And in the narration transmitted by Ibn Shihab the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: It is not meant that you should compel the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for prayer. And (this he said) when 'Umar b. Khattab called (the Holy Prophet) in a loud voice.
[1332]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters, but therein no mention has been made of the words of al-Zuhri: It was narrated to me, and that which followed.
[1333]
'A'isha reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) one night delayed (observing the 'Isya' prayer) till a great part of the night was over and the people in the mosque had gone to sleep. He (the Holy Prophet) then came out and observed prayer and said: This is the proper time for it; were it not that I would impose a burden on my people (I would normally pray at this time). In the hadith transmitters by 'Abd al-Razzaq (the words are): "Were it not that it would impose burden on my people."
[1334]
Abdullah b. Umar reported: We waited one night in expectation of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for the last prayer of the night, and he came out to us when a third of the night had passed even after that. We do not know whether he had been occupied with family business or something else. When he came cut he said: You are waiting for prayer, for which the followers of no other religion wait. except you. Were it not a burden for my Ummah, I would have led them (in the 'Isya' prayer) at this hour. He then ordered the Mu'adhdbin (to call for prayer) and then stood up for prayer and observed prayer.
[1335]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was one night occupied (in some work) and he delayed it ('Isya' prayer) till we went to sleep in the mosque. We then woke up and again went to sleep and again woke up. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then came to us and said: None among the people of the earth except you waits for prayer in the night.
[1336]
Thabit reported: They (the believers) asked Anas about the ring of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: One night the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) delayed (observing) the 'Isya' prayer up to the midnight or midnight was about to be over. He then came and said: (Other) people have offered prayers and slept, but you are constantly in prayer as long as you wait for prayer. Anas said: I perceive as if I am seeing the lustre of his silver ring, and lifted his, small left finger (in order to show how the Holy Prophet had lifted it).
[1337]
Anas b. Malik reported: We waited for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon hi n) one night, till it was about midnight. He (the Holy Prophet) came and observed prayer and then turned his face towards us, as it I was seeing the lustre of the silver ring on his finger.
[1338]
This hadith has been narrated by Qurra with the same chain of transmitters, but therein he did not mention: "He turned his face towards us."
[1339]
Abu Musa reported: I and my companions who had sailed along with me in the boat landed with me in the valley of Buthan while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was staying in Medina. A party of people amongst them went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) every night at the time of the 'Isya' prayer turn by turn. Abu Musa said: (One night) we (I and my companions) went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was occupied in some matter till there was a delay in prayer so much so that it was the middle of the night. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then came out and led them (Musa's companions) in prayer. And when he had observed his prayer he said to the audience present: Take it easy, I am going to give you information and glad tidings that it is the blessing of Allah upon you for there is none among the people, except you, who prays at this hour (of the night), or he said: None except you observed prayer at this. (late) hour. He (i.e. the narrator) said: I am not sure which of these two sentences he actually uttered. Abu Musa, said: We came back happy for what we heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1340]
Ibn Juraij reported: I said to Ata': Which time do you deem fit for me to say the 'Isya' prayer,-as an Imam or alone,-that time which is called by people 'Atama? He said: I heard Ibn 'Abbas saying: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) one night delayed the 'Isya' prayer till the people went to sleep. They woke up and again went to sleep and again woke up. Then 'Umar b. Khattab stood up and said (loudly) "Prayer." Ata' further reported that Ibn 'Abbas said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out, and as if I am still seeing him with water trickling from his head, and with his hand placed on one side of the head, and he said: Were it not hard for my Ummah, I would have ordered them to observe this prayer like this (i.e. at late hours). I inquired from 'Ata' how the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his hand upon his head as Ibn Abbas had informed. So Ata' spread his fingers a little and then placed the ends of his fingers on the side of his head. He then moved them like this over his head till the thumb touched that part of the ear which is near the face and then it (went) to the earlock and the part of the heard. It (the bind) neither held nor caught anything but this is how (it moved oil). I said to Ata': Was it mentioned to you (by Ibn Abbas) how long did the Apostle (may peace be upon him) delay it (the prayer) during that eight? He said: I do not know (I cannot give you the exact time). Ali' said: I love that I should say prayer, whether as an Imam or alone at delayed hours as the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said that night, but if It is hard upon you in your individual capacity or upon people in the congregation and you are their Imam, then say prayer ('Isya') at the middle hours neither too early nor too late.
[1341]
Jabir b. Samura reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) postponed the last 'Isya' prayer.
[1342]
Jabir b. Samura reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe prayers like your prayers, but he would delay the prayer after nightfall to a little after the time you observed it, and he would shorten the prayer.
[1343]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let the bedouin not gain upper hand over you in regard to the name of your prayer. See I (The night prayer should be called) 'Isya' (and the bedouins call it Atama (because) they milk their camels late.
[1344]
Ibn 'Umar said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Let the bedouin not gain upper band over you In regard to the name of your prayer, i.e. night prayer, for it is mentioned 'Isya' in the Book of Allah (i.e. the Qur'an). (The bedouin call it 'Atama because) they make delay in milling their she-camels.
[1345]
'A'isha reported: The believing women used to pray the morning prayer with the Messenger of Allah and then return wrapped in their mantles. No one could recognise them.
[1346]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: The believing women observed the morning prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) wrapped in their mantles. They then went back to their houses and were unrecognisable, because of the Messenger of Allah's (may peace be upon him) praying in the darkness before dawn.
[1347]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe the morning prayer, and the women would go back wrapped in their mantles being unrecognisable because of the darkness before dawn. (Ishaq b. Musa) al-Ansari (one of the transmitters in this chain of narration) narrated "wrapped" (only) in his narration. (No mention was made of mantles.)
[1348]
Muhammad b. 'Amr b. al-Hasan b. 'All reported: When Hajjaj came to Medina we asked Jabir b. Abdullah (about the timings of prayer as observed by the Holy Prophet). He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray afternoon prayer in the midday heat; the afternoon prayer when the sun was bright; the evening prayer when the sun had completely set; and as for the night prayer, he sometimes delayed and sometimes (observed it) at earlier hours. When he found them (his Companions) assembled (at earlier hours) he (prayed) early. and when he saw them coming late, he delayed the (prayer). and the morning prayer the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed in the darkness before dawn.
[1349]
Muhammad b. 'Amr al-Hasan b. 'All reported: Hajjaj used to delay the prayers, and so we asked Jabir b. 'Abdullah, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1350]
Sayyar b. Salama reported: I heard my father asking Abu Barza (al- Aslami) about the prayer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) I (Shu'ba, one of the narrators) said: Did you hear it (from Abu Barza) ? He said: I feel as if I am bearing you at this very time. He said: I heard my father asking about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he (Abu Barza) making this reply: He (the Holy Prophet) did not mind delaying-some (prayer) i.e. 'Isya' prayer, even up to the midnight and did not like sleeping before observing it, and talking after it. Shu'ba said: I met him subsequently and asked him (about the prayers of the Holy Prophet) and he said: He observed the noon prayer when the sun was past the meridian, he would pray the afternoon prayer, after which a person would o to the outskirts of Medina and the sun was still bright; (I forgot what he said about the evening prayer); I then met him on a subsequent occasion and asked him (about the prayers of the Holy Prophet; and he said: He would observe the morning prayer (at such a time) so that a man would go back and would recognise his neighbour by casting a glance at his face, and he would recite from sixty to one hundred verses in it.
[1351]
Sayyar b. Salama reported: I heard Abu Barza saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not mind some delay in the 'Isya' prayer even up to the midnight and he did not like sleeping before (observing it) and talking after it. Shu'ba said: I again met him (Sayyar b. Salama) for the second time and he said: Even up to the third (part) of the night.
[1352]
Abu Barza b. Aslami is reported to have said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) delayed the night prayer till a third of the night had passed and he did not approve of sleeping before it, and talking after it, and he used to recite in the morning prayer from one hundred to sixty verses (and completed the prayer at such hours) when we recognised the faces of one another.
[1353]
Abu Dharr reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: How would you act when you are under the rulers who would delay the prayer beyond its prescribed time, or they would make prayer a dead thing as far as its proper time is concerned? I said: What do you command? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Observe the prayer at Its proper time, and if you can say it along with them do so, for it would be a superetogatory prayer for you. Khalaf (one of the narrators in the above hadith) has not mentioned "beyond their (prescribed) time".
[1354]
Abu Dharr reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: O Abu Dharr, you would soon find after me rulers who would make their prayers dead. You should say prayer at its prescribed time. If you say prayer at its prescribed time that would be a supererogatory prayer for you, otherwise you saved your prayer.
[1355]
Abu Dharr reported: My friend (the Holy Prophet) bade me to hear and obey (the ruler) even if he is a slave having his feet and arms cut off, and observe prayer at its prescribed time. (And further said) : It you find people having observed the prayer, you in fact saved your prayer, otherwise (if you join with them) that would be a Nafl prayer for you.
[1356]
Abu Dharr reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) struck my thigh and said: How would you act if you survive among the people who would delay prayers beyond their (prescribed) time? He (Abu Dharr) said: What do you command (under this situation)? He (the Holy Prophet) slid: Observe prayer at its prescribed time, then go (to meet) your needs, and if the Iqama is pronounced, and you are present in the mosque, then observe prayer (along with the Jama'at).
[1357]
'Abu'l-'Aliyat al-Bara reported: Ibn Ziyad delayed the prayer. 'Abdullah b. Samit came to me and I placed a chair for him and he sat in it and I made a mention of whit Ibn Ziyad had done. He bit hit lips (as a sign of extreme anger and annoyance) and struck at my thigh and said: I asked Abu Dharr as you have asked me, and he struck my thigh just as I have struck your thigh, and said : I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as you have asked me and he struck my thigh just as I have struck your thigh, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: Observe prayer at its prescribed time, and if you can say prayer along with them. do so, and do not say. "I have observed prayer and so I shall not pray."
[1358]
Abu Dharr reported: (The Messenger of Allah) said: How would you, or how would thou, act if you survive to live among people who defer prayer beyond the (prescribed) time? (The narrator said: Allah and His Messenger know best). whereupon he said: Observe prayer at its prescribed time, but if the Iqama is pronounced for (congregational) prayer, then observe prayer along with them. for herein is an excess of virtue.
[1359]
Abu'l-'Aliyat al-Bara' reported: I said to 'Abdullah b. Samit: We say our Jumu'a prayer behind those rulers who defer the prayer. He ('Abdullah b. Samit), struck. my thigh that I felt pain and said: I asked Abu Dharr about it, he struck my thigh and said: I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about it. Upon this he said: Observe prayer at its prescribed time, and treat prayer along with them (along with those Imams who deter prayer) as Nafl. 'Abdullah said: It was narrated to me that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) struck the thigh of Abd Dharr.
[1360]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Prayer said in a congregation is twenty-five degrees more excellent than prayer said by a single person.
[1361]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Prayer said in a congregation is twenty-five degrees more excellent than prayer said by a single person. He (Abu Huraira further) said: The angels of the night and the angels of the day meet together. Abu Huraira said: Recite it you like: "Surely the recital of the Qur'an at dawn is witnessed" (al-Qur'an, xvii. 78).
[1362]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira with another chain of transmitters with a very slight change of words.
[1363]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Prayer said in a congregation is equivalent to twenty-five (prayers) as compared with the prayer said by a single person.
[1364]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: Prayer along with the Imam is twenty-five times more excellent than prayer said by a single person.
[1365]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) assaying: Prayer said in a congregation is twenty-seven degrees more excellent than prayer said by a single person.
[1366]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The prayer of a person in congregation is twenty-seven times in excess to the prayer said alone.
[1367]
Ibn Numair reported it on the authority of his father (a preference of) more than twenty (degrees) and Abu Bakr in his narration (has narrated it) twenty- seven degrees.
[1368]
Ibn 'Umar reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as some and twenty (degrees).
[1369]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) found some people absenting from certain prayers and he said: I intend that I order (a) person to lead people in prayer, and then go to the persons who do not join the (congregational prayer) and then order their houses to be burnt by the bundles of fuel. If one amongst them were to know that he would find a fat fleshy bone he would attend the night prayer.
[1370]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most burdensome prayers for the hypocrites are the night prayer and the morning prayer. If they were to know the blessings they have in store, they would have come to them, even though crawling, and I thought that I should order the prayer to be commenced and command a person to lead people in prayer, and I should then go along with some persons having a fagot of fuel with them to the people who have not attended the prayer (in congregation) and would burn their houses with fire.
[1371]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: This is what Abu Huraira reported to us from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and (in this connection) he narrated some ahadith, one of them is: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I intend that I should command my young men to gather bundles fuel for me, and then order a person to lead people in prayer, and then burn the houses with their inmates (who have not joined the congregation).
[1372]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira.
[1373]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying about people who are absent from Jumu'a prayer: I intend that I should command a person to lead people in prayer, and then burn those persons who absent themselves from Jumu'a prayer in their houses.
[1374]
Abu Huraira reported: There came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) a blind man and said: Messenger of Allah, I have no one to guide me to the mosque. He, therefore, asked. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permission to say prayer in his house. He (tee Holy Prophet) granted him permission. Then when the man turned away he called him and said: Do you hear the call to prayer? He said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet then) said: Respond to it.
[1375]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: I have seen the time when no one stayed away from prayer except a hypocrite, whose hypocrisy was well known, or a sick man, but it a sick man could walk between two persons (i.e. with the help of two persons with one on each side) he would come to prayer. And (further) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) taught us the paths of right guidance. among which is prayer in the mosque in which the Adzan is called.
[1376]
Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: He who likes to meet Allah tomorrow as Muslim, he should persevere in observing these prayers, when a call is announced for them, for Allah has laid down for your Prophet the paths of right guidance, and these (prayers) are among the paths of right guidance. If you were to pray in your houses as this man why stays away (from the mosque) prays in his house, you would abandon the practice of your Prophet, and if you were to abandon the practice of your Prophet, you would go astray. No man purifies himself, doing it well, then makes for one of those mosques without Allah recording a blessing for him for every step he takes raising him a degree for it, and effacing a sin from him for it. I have seen the time when no one stayed away from it, except a hypocrite, who was well known for his hypocrisy, whereas a man would be brought swaying (due to weakness) between two men till he was set up in a row.
[1377]
Abu Sha'tha' reported: While we were sitting with Abu Huraira in a mosque a man went out of the mosque after the call to prayer had been announced. (A man stood up in the mosque and set off.) Abu Huraira's eyes followed him till he went out of the mosque. Upon this Abu Huraira said : This man has disobeyed Abu'l- Qasim (Muhammad) (may peace be upon him).
[1378]
Abu Sha'tha' al-Muharibi reported on the authority of his father, who said: I heard it from Abu Huraira that he saw a person getting out of the mosque after the call to prayer had been announced. Upon this he remarked: This (man) disobeyed Abu'l-Qasim (may peace be upon him).
[1379]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abd 'Amr reported: 'Uthman b. 'Affan (narrated the mosque after evening prayer and sat alone. I also sat alone with him, so he said: 0, son of m brother, I heard tile Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: He who observed the 'Isya' prayer in congregation, it was as if he prayed up to the midnight, and he who prayed the morning prayer in congregation, it was as if he prayed the whole night.
[1380]
This hadith has been narrated by the chain of transmitters by Abu Sahl 'Uthman b. Hakim.
[1381]
Jundab b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who prayed the morning prayer (in congregation) he is in fact under the protection of Allah. And it can never happen that Allah should demand anything from you in connection with the protection (that He guarantees) and one should not get it. He would then throw him in the fire of Hell.
[1382]
Anas b. Sirin reported: I heard Jundab b. Qasri saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who observed the morning prayer (in congregation), he is in fact under the protection of Allah and it never happens that Allah should make a demand in connection with the protection (that He guarantees and should not get it) for when he asks for anything in relation to His protection, he definitely secures it. He then throws him flatly in the Hell-fire.
[1383]
This hadith has been narrated by Jundab b. Sufyan in from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) with the same chain of transmitters, but this has not been mentioned: "He would throw him in fire."
[1384]
Mahmud b. al-Rabi' reported that 'Ibn b. Malik, who was one of the Companions of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and who participated in the (Battle of) Badr and was among the Ansar (of Medina), told that he came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, I have lost my eyesight and I lead my people in prayer. When there is a downpour there is then a current (of water) in the valley that stands between me and them and I find it impossible to go to their mosque and lead them in prayer. Messenger of Allah, I earnestly beg of you that you should come and observe prayer at a place of worship (in my house) so that I should then use it as a place of worship. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Well, it God so wills. I would soon do so. 'Itban said: On the following day when the day dawned, the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) came along with Abu Bakr at-Siddiq, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked permission (to get into the house). I gave him the permission, and be did not sit after entering the house, when he said: At what place in your house you desire me to say prayer? I ('Itban b. Malik) said: I pointed to a corner in the house, The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood (at that place for prayer) and pronounced Allah-o-Akbar (Allah is the Greatest) (as an expression for the commencement of prayer). We too stood behind him, and he said two rak'ahs and then pronounced salutation (marking the end of the prayer). We detained him (the Holy Prophet) for the meat curry we had prepared for, him. The people of the neighbouring houses came and thus there was a good gathering in (our house). One of them said: Where is Malik b. Dukhshun? Upon this one of them remarked: He is a hypocrite; he does not love Allah and His Messenger. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do not say so about him. Don't you see that he utters La ilaha ill-Allah (There is no god but Allah) and seeks the pleasure of Allah through it? They said: Allah and His Messenger know beet. One (among the audience) said: We see his inclination and wellwishing for hypocrites only. Upon this the Messenger of Allah'(may peace be upon him) again said: Verily Allah has forbidden the Fire for one who says: There is no god but Allah, thereby seeking Allah's pleasure. Ibn Shihab said: I asked Husain b. Muhammad al-Ansar (he was one of the leaders of Banu Salim) about the hadith transmitted by Mahmud b. Rabi' and he testified it.
[1385]
'Itban b. Malik reported : I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated (above) except this that a man said: Where is Malik b. Dukhshun or Dukhaishin, and also made this addition that Mahmud said: I narrated this ver hadith to many people and among them was Abu Ayyub al-Ansari who said: I cannot think that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) could have said so as you say. He (the narrator) said: I took an oath that if I ever go to 'Itban. I would ask him about it. So I went to him and found him to be a very aged man, having lost his eyesight, but he was the Imam of the people. I sat by his side and asked about this hadith and he narrated it In the same way as he had narrated it for the first time. Then so many other obligatory acts and commands were revealed which we see having been completed. So he who wants that he should not be deceived would not be deceived.
[1386]
Mahmud b. Rabi' reported: I well remember the disgorge of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he did (with water) from a bucket of our house. Mahmud said: 'Itban b. Malik narrated it to me that he had said: Messenger of Allah, I have lost my eyesight, and the rest of the hadith is the same up to these words: "He led us in two rak'ahs of prayer and we detained the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for serving him the pudding that we had prepared for him," and no mention has been made of what follows next from the addition made by Yunus and Ma'mar.
[1387]
Anas b. Malik reported that his grandmother, Mulaika, invited the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to a dinner which she had prepared. He (the Holy Prophet) ate out of that and then said: Stand up so that I should observe prayer (in order to bless) you Anas b. Malik said: I stood up on a mat (belonging to us) which had turned dark on account of its long use. I sprinkled water over it (in order to soften it), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood upon it, and I and an orphan formed a row behind him (the Holy Prophet) and the old woman was behind us, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in two rak'ahs of prayer and then went back.
[1388]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) wits the best among people in character. On occasions, the time of prayer would come while he was in our house. He would then order to spread the mat lying under him. That was dusted and then water was sprinkled over it. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then led the prayer and we stood behind him, and that mat was made of the leaves of date-palm.
[1389]
Thabit reported on the authority of Anas: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us and there was none in our house but I, my mother and my aunt Umm Haram. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Stand up so that I may lead you in prayer (and there was no time for prescribed prayer). He led us in prayer. A person said to Thabit: Where stood Anas with him (the Holy Prophet)? He replied: He was on the right side. He then blessed us, the members of the household with every good of this world and of the Hereafter. My mother said: Messenger of Allah (and then, pointing towards Anas, said), here is your little servant, invoke the blessing of Allah upon him too. He then blessed me with every good, and he concluded his blessings for me (with these words): Allah ! increase his wealth, and his children and make (them the source of) blessing for him.
[1390]
Abdullah b. al-Mukhtar heard Musa b. Anas narrating on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led him, his mother or his aunt in prayer. He made me, stand on his right side and made the woman stand, behind us.
[1391]
This hadith has also been narrated by Shu'ba with this chain of transmitters.
[1392]
Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said prayer while I was by his side, and at times when he prostrated his cloth touched me, and he prayed on a small mat.
[1393]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that he went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and found him observing prayer on a mat and prostrating on that.
[1394]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A man's prayer in congregation is more valuable than twenty degrees and some above them as compared with his prayer in his house and his market, for when he performs ablution doing it well, then goes out to the mosque, and he is impelled (to do so) only by (the love of congregational) prayer, he has no other objective before him but prayer. He does not take a step without being raised a degree for it and having a sin remitted for it, till he enters the mosque, and when he is busy in prayer after having entered the mosque. the angels continue to invoke blessing on him as long as he is in his place of worship. saying: O Allah, show him mercy, and pardon him ! Accept his repentance (and the angels continue this supplication for him) so long as he does not do any harm in it, or as long as his ablution is not broken.
[1395]
A hadith having the same meaning (as mentioned above) has been transmitted by A'mash.
[1396]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The angels invoke blessings on everyone among you so long as he is in a place of worship with these words: O Allah ! pardon him, O Allah, have mercy upon him, (and they continue to do so) as long as, he ablution (of the worshipper) is not broken, and one among you is in prayer and so long as he is detained for the prayer.
[1397]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant is constantly in prayer so long as he is in a place of worship waiting for the prayer (to be observed in congregation), and the angels invoke (blessings upon him in these words): O Allah ! pardon him. O Allah ! show mercy to him, (and they continue to do so) till he returns (from the mosque having completed the prayer) or his ablution breaks. I said: How is the ablution broken? He said: By breaking of the wind noiselessly or with noise.
[1398]
Abu Huraira reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: Everyone among you is constantly in prayer so long as the prayer detains him (for this noble objective) and nothing prevents him to return to his family but the prayer.
[1399]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Anyone amongst you who sat in a place of worship waiting for the prayer is in prayer and his ablution is not broken, the angels invoke blessing upon him (in these words): O Allah !pardon him. O Allah ! have mercy upon him.
[1400]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Hammam b. Munabbih on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[1401]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most eminent among human beings (as a recipient of) reward (is one) who lives farthest away, and who has to walk the farthest distance, and he who waits for the prayer to observe it along with the Imam, his reward is greater than one who prays (alone) and then goes to sleep. In the narration of Abu Kuraib (the words are): "(He waits) till he prays along with the Imam in congregation."
[1402]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported: There was a man, and I do not know of any other man, whose house was farther than his from the mosque and he never missed the prayer (in congregation). It was said to him or I said to him: It you were to buy a donkey you could ride upon it In the dark nights and in the burning sand. He said: I do not like my house to be situated by the side of the mosque, for I (eagerly) desire that my steps towards the mosque and back from it, should be recorded when I return to my family. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Allah has gathered all (rewards) for you.
[1403]
This hadith has been transmitted by Taimi with the same chain of narrators.
[1404]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported: There was a person among the Ansar whose house was situated at the farthest end of Medina, but he never in missed any prayer along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). We felt pity for him and said to him: O, so and so, had you bought a donkey it would have saved you from the burning sand and would have saved you from the reptiles of the earth. He said : Listen I by Allah, I do not like my house to be situated by the side of Muhammad (may peace be upon him). I took (these words of his) ill and came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and informed him about (these words). He (the Holy Prophet) called him and he said exactly like that (which he had mentioned to Ubbay b. Ka'b), but made a mention of this (also) that he wanted a reward for his steps. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: In fact for you is the reward which you expect.
[1405]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Asim with the same chain of transmitters.
[1406]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah narrated: Our houses were situated far away from the mosque; we, therefore, decided to sell our houses so that we may be able to come near the mosque. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade us (to do so) and said: There is for every step (towards the mosque) a degree (of reward) for you.
[1407]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: There were some plots vacant around the mosque. Banu Salama decided to shift (to this land) and come near the mosque. This (news) reached the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said to them (Banu Salama): I have received (information) that you intend to shift near the mosque. They said: Yes, Messenger of Allah, we have taken this decision. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: O Banu Salama, live in your houses, for your steps are recorded; live in your houses, for your steps are recorded.
[1408]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Banu Salama decided to shift near the mosque (as there were) some plots vacant. This (news) reached the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: O people of the Salama tribe, you better stay in your houses (where you are living), for your footsteps are recorded They said. We could not be more delighted even by shifting (near the mosque) as we were delighted (on hearing these words from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1409]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be' upon him) said: He who purified himself in his house, and then he walked to one of the houses of Allah for the sake of performing a Fard (obligatory act) out of the Fara'id (obligatory acts) of Allah, both his steps (would be significant) as one of them would obliterate his sin and the second one would raise his status.
[1410]
In the hadith narrated of the authority of Abd Huraira the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said. while in the hadith narrated by Bakr (the words are like this) : He heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: just see, can anything of his filthiness remain (on the body of) any one of you if there were a river at his door in which he washed himself five times daily? They, said: Nothing of his filthiness will remain (on his body). He said: That is like the five prayers by which Allah obliterates sins.
[1411]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The similitude of five prayers is like an overflowing river passing by the gate of one of you in which he washes five times daily Hasan said: No filthiness can remain on him.
[1412]
Ata' b. Yasar reported, on the authority of Abu Huraira, the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who went towards the mosque in the morning or evening, Allah would arrange a feast for him morning or evening in Paradise.
[1413]
Simak b. Harb reported: I said to Jabir b. Samura: Did you sit in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him)? He said: Yes, very often. He (the Holy Prophet) used to sit at the place where he observed the morning or dawn prayer till the sun rose or when it had risen; he would stand, and they (his Companions) would talk about matters (pertaining to the days) of ignorance, and they would laugh (on these matters) while (the Holy Prophet) only smiled.
[1414]
Simak narrated on the authority of Jabir b. Samura that when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the dawn prayer, he sat at the place of worship till the sun had risen enough.
[1415]
This hadith has been narrated by Simak with the same chain of transmitters, but no mention has been made of ,enough".
[1416]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The parts of land dearest to Allah are its mosques, and the parts most hateful to Allah are markets.
[1417]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When there are three persons, one of them should lead them. The one among them most worthy to act as Imam is one who is best versed in the Qur'an.
[1418]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Qatida with the same chain of transmitters.
[1419]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Sa'id al-Khudri by another chain of transmitters.
[1420]
Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The one who is most versed in Allah's Book should act as Imam for the people, but If they are equally versed in reciting it, then the one who has most knowledge regarding Sunnah if they are equal regarding the Sunnah, then the earliest one to emigrate; it they emigrated at the same time, then the earliest one to embrace Islam. No man must lead another in prayer where (the latter) has authority, or sit in his place of honour in his house, without his permission. Ashajj in his narration used the word , "age" in place of "Islam".
[1421]
A hadith like this has been narrated by A'mash by the same chain of transmitters
[1422]
Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to us: The one who is well grounded in Allah's Book and is distinguished among them in recitation should act as ; Imam for the people. and if they are equally versed in reciting it, then the one who has most knowledge regarding Sunnah; if they are equal regarding the Sunnah, then the earliest one to emigrate; If they emigrated at the same time, then the oldest one in age. No man must lead another in prayer in latter's house or where (the latter) has authority, or sit in his place of honour in his house, except that he gives you permission or with his permission.
[1423]
Malik b. Huwairith rejected: We came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and we were all young men of nearly equal age. We stayed with him (the Holy Prophet) for twenty nights, and as the Messenger of Allah may peace be upon him) was extremely kind and tender of heart, he. therefore, thought that we were eager (to see) our family (we felt home-sickness). So he asked us about the members of the family that we had left behind and when we informed him, he said: Go back to your family, stay with them, and teach them (beliefs and practices of Islam) and exhort them to good, and when the time for prayer comes, one amongst you should-announce Adzan and then the oldest among you should lead the prayer.
[1424]
This hadith has been transmitted by Ayyub with the same chain of narrator.
[1425]
Malik b. Huwairith Abu Sulaiman reported: I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) along with other persons and we were young men of nearly equal age, and the rest of the hadith was transmitted like the hadith narrated before.
[1426]
Malik b Huwairith reported: I came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) along with a companion of mine, and when we intended to return from him, he said: When there is time for prayer, announce prayer, pronounce Iqama, and the oldest amongst you should lead the prayer.
[1427]
This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters, but al-Hadra' made this addition: "They both were equal in recitation."
[1428]
Abu Salama b. Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf heard Abu Huraira say: (When) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (wished to invoke curse or blessing on someone, he would do so at the end) of the recitation in the dawn prayer, when he had pronounced Allah-o-Akbar (for bending) and then lifted his head (saying): "Allah listened to him who praised Him; our Lord ! to Thee is all praise"; he would then stand up and say: "Rescue al-Walid b. Walid, Salama b. Hisham, and 'Ayyash b. Abd Rabi'a, and the helpless among the Muslims. O Allah ! trample severely Mudar and cause them a famine (which broke out at the time) of Joseph. O Allah! curse Lihyan, Ri'l, Dhakwan, 'Usayya, for they disobeyed Allah and His Messenger." (The narrator then adds): The news reached us that he abandoned (this) when this verse was revealed: "Thou but no concern in the matter whether He turns to them (mercifully) or chastises them ; surely they are wrongdoers" (ill. 127)
[1429]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters up to the words: "And cause them a famine like that (which broke out at the time) of Joseph," but the subsequent portion was not mentioned.
[1430]
Abu Salama reported it on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited Qunut after ruku' in prayer for one mouth at the time of reciting (these words): "Allah listened to him who praised Him," and he said in Qunut: "0 Allah! rescue al-Walid b. al-Walid; O Allah! rescue Salama b. Hisham; O Allah! rescue 'Ayyash b. Abu Rabi'a; O Allah! rescue the helpless amongst the Muslims; O Allah! trample Mudar severely; O Allah! cause them a famine like that (which was caused at the time) of Joseph." Abu Huraira (further) said: I saw that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) afterwards abandoned this supplication. I, therefore said: I see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) abandoning this blessing upon them. It was raid to him (Abu Huraira): Don't you see that (those for whom was blessing invoked by the Holy Prophet) have come (i.e. they have been rescued)?
[1431]
Abu Salama narrated that Abu Huraira told him that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced: "Allah listened to him who praised Him." and before prostration, he would recite this in the 'Isya' prayer: O Allah! rescue 'Ayyash b. Abu Rabi'a, and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Auza'i to the words: "Like the famine (at the time) if Joseph." but he made no mention of that which follows afterwards.
[1432]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman is reported to have said that he had heard Abu Huraira saying: I would say prayer along with you which is near to the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). and Abu Huraira recited Qunut in the noon and in the 'Isya' and in the morning prayer, and invoked blessing (of Allah) upon Muslims-and curse upon the unbelievers.
[1433]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) invoked curse in the morning (prayer) for thirty days upon those who killed the Companions (of the Holy Prophet) at Bi'r Ma'una. He cursed (the tribes) of Ri'l, Dhakwan, Lihyan, and Usayya, who had disobeyed Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him). Anas said: Allah the Exalted and Great revealed (a verse) regarding those who were killed at Bi'r Ma'una, and we recited it, till it was abrogated later on (and the verse was like this): ,convey to it our people the tidings that we have met our Lord, and He was pleased with us and we were pleased with Him".
[1434]
Muhammad reported: I asked Anas whether the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut in the dawn prayer. He said: Yes, (he did so) after the ruku', for a short while.
[1435]
Anas b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut for a month in the dawn prayer after ruku' and invoked curse upon Ri'l, Dhakwan, and said that 'Usayya had disobeyed Allah and His Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[1436]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut for a month in the dawn prayer after ruku' and invoked curse upon Bani Usayya.
[1437]
Asim reported: I asked Anas whether Qunut was observed (by the Holy prophet) before ruku' or after ruku'. He replied: Before ruku' . I said: People conceive that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut after the ruku'. He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut (after the ruku' as the people conceive it) for a mouth invoking curse upon those persons who had killed men among his Companions who were called the reciter (of the Qur'an).
[1438]
'Asim reported - I heard Anas saying: Never did I ace the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) so much grieved (at the loss of a) small army as I saw him grieved at those seventy men who were called "reciters" (and were killed) at Bi'r Ma'una; and he invoked curse for full one month upon their murderers.
[1439]
This hadith has been narrated by Anas with another chain of transmitters and with minor additions.
[1440]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut for one month Invoking curse upon Ri'l, Dhakwan, 'Usayya. those who disobeyed Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[1441]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Anas from the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him).
[1442]
Anas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut for one month invoking curse upon some tribes of Arabia (those who were responsible for the murders in Bi'r Ma'una and Raji'), but then abandoned it.
[1443]
Al-Bari' b. 'Azib reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut in the morning and evening (prayers).
[1444]
Al-Bari' reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Qunut in the dawn and evening (prayers).
[1445]
Khufaf b. Ima' al-Ghifari reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) aid in prayer: 0 Allah I curse the tribes of Lihyan, Ri'l, Dhakwan, and 'Usayya for they disobeyed Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him). Allah pardoned (the tribe of) Ghifar and Allah granted protection to (the tribe of) Aslam
[1446]
Khufaf b. Ima' reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him), bowed (in prayer) and then lifted his head and then said: So far as the tribe of Ghifar is concerned, Allah had pardoned it, and Allah had granted protection to the tribe of Aslam, and as for the tribe of Usayya, It had disobeyed Allah and His Messenger, (and further said): O Allah! curse the tribe of Lihyan curse Ri'l, and Dhakwan, and then fell in prostration. It is after this that the cursing of the unbelievers got a sanction.
[1447]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Khufaf b. Ima' except this that he did not mention (these words): "cursing of unbelievers got a sanctions.
[1448]
Abu Huraira reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) returned from the expedition to Khaibar, he travelled one night, and stopped for rest when he became sleepy. He told Bilal to remain on guard during the night and he (Bilal) prayed as much as he could, while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his Companions slept. When the time for dawn approached Bilal leaned against his camel facing the direction from which the dawn would appear but he was overcome by sleep while he was leaning against his camel, and neither the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) nor Bilal, nor anyone else among his Companions got up, till the sun shone on them. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the first of them to awake and, being startled, he called to Bilal who said: Messenger of Allah I may my father and mother be offered as ransom for thee, the same thing overpowered me which overpowered you. He (the Holy Prophet, then) said: Lead the beasts on: so they led their camels to some distance. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then performed ablution and gave orders to Bilal who pronounced the Iqama and then led them in the morning prayer. When he finished the prayer he said: When anyone forgets the prayer, he should observe it when he remembers it, for Allah has said: "And observe the prayer for remembrance of Me" (Qur'an. xx. 14). Yunus said: Ibn Shilab used to recite it like this: "(And observe the prayer) for remembrance."
[1449]
Abu Huraira reported : We stopped for rest along with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and did not awake till the sun rose. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) then told us that everybody should take hold of his camel's nosestring (get out of this ground) for it was the place where devil had visited us. We did accordingly. He then called for water and performed ablution and then performed two prostrations. Ya'qub said: Then he prayed (performed) two prostrations. then takbir was pronounced for prayer and then he offered the morning prayer (in congregation).
[1450]
Abu Qatida reported: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) addressed us and said: You would travel In the evening and the might till (God willing) you would come in the morning to a place of water. So the people travelled (self absorbed) without paying any heed to one another, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also travelled till It was midnight. I was by his side. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) began to doze and leaned (to one side) of his camel. I came to him and I lent him support without awaking him till he sat poised on his ride. He went on travelling till a major part of the night was over and (he again) leaned (to one side) of his camel. I supported him without awaking him till he sat "bed on his ride. and then travelled till it was near dawn. He (again) leaned which was far more inclined than the two earlier leanings and he was about to fall down. So I came to him and supported him and he lifted his head and said ; Who is this? I said: it is Abu Qatida. He (the Holy Prophet again) said: Since how long have you been travelling along with me like this? I said: I have been travelling in this very state since the night. He said: May Allah protect you, as you have protected His Apostle (from falling down), and again said: Do you see that we are hidden from the people?- and again said: Do you see anyone? I said: Here is a rider. I again said: Here Is another rider till we gathered together and we were seven riders. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stepped aside of the highway and placed his head (for sleep and said): Guard for us our prayers. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was the first to wake up and the rays of the sun were falling on his back. We got up startled He (the Holy Prophet) said: Ride on So we rode on till the sun had (sufficiently) risen. He then came down from his camel and called for a jug of water which I had with me. There was a little water in that. He performed ablution kith that which was less thorough as compared with his usual ablutions and some water of that had been left. He (the Holy Prophet) said to Abu Qatida: Keep a watch over your jug of water; it would have (a miraculous) condition about it. Then Bilal summoned (people) to prayer and then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed two rak'ahs and then said the morning prayer as he said every day. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (then) rode on and we rode along with him and some of us whispered to the others saying: How would there be compensation for omission in our prayers? Upon this he (the Apostle of Allah) said: Is there not in me (my life) a model for you ? There is no omission in sleeping. The (cognizable) emission is that one should not say prayer (intentionally) till the time of (he other prayer comes. So he who did like it (omitted prayer in sleep or due to other unavoidable circumstances) should say prayer when he becomes aware of it and on the next day he should observe it at its prescribed time. He (the Holy Prophet) said: What do you think the people would have done (at this hour)? They would have in the morning found their Apostle missing from amongst them and then Abu Bakr and 'Umar would have told them that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) must be behind you, he cannot leave you behind (him), but the people said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) is ahead of you. So if you had obeyed Abu Bakr and Umar, you would have gone on the right path. So we proceeded on till we came up to the people (from whom we had lagged behind) and the day had considerably risen and everything became hot, and they (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: Messenger of Allah, we are dying of thirst. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) remarked: There is no destruction for you. And again said: Bring that small cup of mine and he then asked for the jug of water to be brought to him. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) began to pour water (in that small cup) and Abu Qatida gave them to drink. And when the people saw that there was (a little) water in the jug, they fell upon it. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Behave well; the water (is enough) to satiate all of you. Then they (the Companions) began to receive (their share of) water with calmness (without showing any anxiety) and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) began to fill (the cap), and I began to serve them till no one was left except me and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He then filled (the cup) with water and said to me: Drink it. I said: Messenger of Allah, I would not drink till you drink. Upon this he said: The server of the people Is the last among them to drink. So I drank and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also drank and the people came to the place of water quite happy and satiated. 'Abdullah b. Rabah said: I am going to narrate this hadith in the great mosque, when 'Imran b. Husain said: See, O young man, how will you narrate for I was also one of the riders on that night? I said: So you must be knowing this hadith well. He said: Who are you? I said: I am one of the Ansar. Upon this he said: You narrate, for you know your hadith better. I, therefore, narrated it to the people. 'Imran said: I was also present that night, but I know not anyone else who learnt it so well as you have learnt.
[1451]
'Imran b. Husain reported: I was with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) in a journey. We travelled the whole of the night, and when it was about to dawn, we got down for rest, and were overpowered (by sleep) till the sun shone. Abu Bakr was the first to awake amongst us. and we did not awake the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) from his sleep allowing him to wake up (of his own accord). It was 'Umar who then woke up. He stood by the side of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and recited takbir in a loud voice till the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) woke up. When he lifted his head, he saw that the sun had arisen; he then said: Proceed on. He travelled along with us till the sun shone brightly. He came down (from his camel) and led us in the morning prayer. A person, however, remained away from the people and did not say, prayer along with us. After having completed the prayer, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: O, so and so, what prevented you from observing prayer with us? He said: Apostle of Allah! I was not in a state of purity. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered him arid lie performed Tayammum with dust and said prayer. He then urged me to go ahead immediately along with other riders to find out water, for we felt very thirsty. We were traveling when we came across a woman who was sitting (on a camel) with her feet hanging over two leathern water bags. We said to her: How far is water available? She , said: Far, very far, very far. You cannot get water. We (again) said: How much distance is there between (the residence of) your family and water? She said: It is a day and night journey. We said to her: You go to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: Who is the Messenger of Allah ? We somehow or the other managed to bring her to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he asked about her, and she informed him as she had informed us that she was a widow having orphan children. He ordered that her camel should be made to kneal down and he gargled in the opening (of her leathern water-bag). The camel was then raised up and we forty thirsty men drank water till we were completely satiated, and we filled up all leathern water-bags and water-skins that we had with us and we washed our companions, but we did not make any camel drink, and (the leathern water-bags) were about to burst (on account of excess of water). He then said: Bring whatever you have with you. So we collected the bits (of estable things) and dates and packed them up in a bundle, and said to her : Take it away. This is meant for your children, and know that we have not its any way done any loss to your water.W hen she came to her family she said: I have met the greatest magician amongst human beings, or he is an apostle, as he claims to be, and she then narrated what had happened and Allah guided aright those people through that woman. She affirmed her faith in Islam and so did the people embrace Islam.
[1452]
'Imran b. Husain reported : We were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in a journey and we travelled throughout the night till at the end, just before dawn, we lay down (for rest), and nothing is sweeter for a traveller than this and none awakened us but the heat of the sun, and the rest of the hadith is the same (as mentioned above) except this additien : "When 'Umar b. Khattab woke up, he saw what had happened to the people. And he was a man having a big belly and strongly built ; he recited takbir in a loud voice till the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) woke up by the loudness of his voice in takbir. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up, the people told him what had happened. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There is no harm; you better proceed further," and (the rest of the hadith) was narrated.
[1453]
Abu Qatada reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in a journey he got down for rest at night, and he used to lie down on his right side, and when he lay down for rest before the dawn, he used to stretch his forearm and place his head over his palm.
[1454]
Qatada reported from Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who forgets the prayer should say it when he remembers it, there is no explation for it, except this. Qatada said : (Allah says) "And observe prayer for remembrance of Me "
[1455]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada, but here no mention has been made of "There is no explation for it except this."
[1456]
Qatada narrated it on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : He who forgets tte prayer, or he slept (and it was omitted), its expiation is this only that he should observe it when he remembers it.
[1457]
Qatada reported it on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : When any one of you omits the prayer due to sleep or he forgets it, he should observe it when he remembers it, for Allah has said: "Observe prayer for remembrance of Me."
[1458]
'A'isha, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported : The prayer was prescribed as two rak'abs, two rak'ahs both in journey and at the place of residence. The prayer while travelling remained as it was (originally prescribed), but an addition was made in the prayer (observed) at the place of residence.
[1459]
'A'isha, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), said Allah prescribed the prayer as two rak'ahs, then it was completed (to four rak'ahs) at the place of residence, but was retained in the same position in journey as it was first made obligatory.
[1460]
'A'isha reported: The prayer was prescribed as consisting of two rak'abs, the prayer in travelling remained the same, but the prayer at the place of residence was completed. (Zuhri said he asked 'Urwa why 'A'isha said prayer in the complete form during journey, and he replied that she interpreted the matter herself as 'Uthman did.)
[1461]
Yahya b. Umayya said: I told 'Umar b. al-Khattab that Allah had said: "You may shorten the prayer only if you fear that those who are unbelievers may afflict you" (Qur'an, iv. 101), whereas the people are now safe. He replied : I wondered about it in the same way as you wonder about it, so I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about it and he said: It is an act of charity which Allah has done to you, so accept His charity.
[1462]
Ya'la b. Umayya reported : I said to 'Umar b. al-Khattab, and the rest of the hadlth is the same.
[1463]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : Allah has prescribed the prayer through the word of your Prophet (may peace be upon him) as four rak'ahs when resident, two when travelling, and one when danger is present.
[1464]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : Allah has prescribed the prayer by the tongue of your Apostle (may peace be upon him) as two rak'ahs for the traveller, four for the resident, and one in danger.
[1465]
Musa b. Salama Hudhali said: I asked Ibn 'Abbas: How should I say prayer when I am in Mecca, and when I do not pray along with the Imam? He said: Two rak'ahs (of prayer) is the Sunnah of Abu'l-Qasim (may peace be upon him).
[1466]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[1467]
Hafs b. 'Asim said: I accompanied Ibn 'Umar on the road to Mecca and he led us in two rak'ahs at the noon prayer, then he went forward and we too went along with him to a place where he alighted, and he sat and we sat along with him, and he cast a glance to the side where he said prayer and he saw people standing and asked: What are they doing? I said: They are engaged in glorifying Allah, offering Sunnah prayer. He said: If I had done so I would have perfected my prayer; O my nephew ! I accompanied the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey, and he made no addittion to two rak'ahs, till Allah called him. I accompanied Abu Bakr and he made no addition to two rak'ahs till Allah caused him to die. I accompanied 'Umar and he made no addition to two rak'ahs till Allah caused him to die. I accompanied 'Uthman and he made no addition to two rak'ahs, till Allah caused him to die, and Allah has said: "There is a model pattern for you in the Messenger of Allah" (al-Qur'an, xxxiii. 21).
[1468]
Hafs b. 'Asim reported: I fell ill and lbn 'Umar came to inquire after my health, and I asked him about the glorification of Allah (i.e. prayer) while travelling. Thereupon he said: I accompanied the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey but I did not see him glorifying Him, and were I to glorify (Him). I would have completed the prayer. Allah, the Exalted, has said: "Verily there is a model pattern for you in the Messenger of Allah."
[1469]
Anas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said four rak'ahs in the noon prayer while at Medina, but he offered two rak'ahs in the afternoon prayer at Dhu'l-Hulaifa.
[1470]
Anas b. Malik is reported to have said: I observed four rak'ahs in the noon prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at Medina, and said two rak'ahs in the afternoon prayer at Dhu'l-Hulaifa.
[1471]
Yahya b. Yazid al-Huna'i reported: I asked Anas b. Malik about shortening of prayer. He said: When the Messenger of' Allah (may peace be upon him) had covered a distance of three miles or three farsakh (Shu'ba, one of the narrators, had some doubt about it) he observed two rak'ahs.
[1472]
Jubair b. Nufair reported: I went along with Shurahbil b. al-Simt to a village which was situated at a distance of seventeen or eighteen miles, and he said only two rak'ahs of prayer. I said to him (about it) and he said: I saw 'Umar observing two rak'ahs at Dhu'l-Hulaifa and I (too) said to him (about it) and he said: I am doing the same as I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) doing. (This hadith has been transmitted by Shu'ba with the same chain of narrators and it is narrated from Simt, and the name of Shurahbil has not been mentioned, and he said that he had gone to a place called Dumin, situated at a distance of eighteen miles from Hims.)
[1473]
Anas b. Malik reported: We went out from Medina to Mecca with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he prayed two rak'ahs at each time of prayer till we returned to Medina. I said: For how long did he stay in Mecca? He said: (For) ten (days).
[1474]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Anas by another chain of transmitters.
[1475]
Yahya b. Abu Ishaq reported: I heard Anas b. Malik say: We went out for Pilgrimage from Medina. The rest is the same.
[1476]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Anas, but no mention has been made of Pilgrimage.
[1477]
Salim b. 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) observed the prayer of a traveller, i.e. two rak'ahs in Mina, and other places; so did Abu Bakr and 'Umar, and 'Uthman too observed two rak'abs at the beginning of his caliphate, but he then completed four.
[1478]
A hadith like this has been reported by Zuhri, with the same chain of transmitters, and in it mention was made of Mina only, but not of other places.
[1479]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said two rak'ahs at Mina, and Abu Bakr after him, and 'Umar after Abu Bakr, and 'Uthman at the beginning of his caliphate; then 'Uthman observed four rak'ahs, and when Ibn 'Umar prayed with the Imam, he said four rak'ahs, but when he observed prayer alone, he said two rak'ahs.
[1480]
A hadith like this has been narrated by the same chain of transmitters.
[1481]
Ibn 'Umar reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said in Mina the prayer of a traveller (short prayer); Abu Bakr and 'Umar did the same and 'Uthmia did it for eight years or six years. Hafs (one of the narrators) said: Ibn 'Umar would also say two rak'ahs at Mina and then go to bed. I said to him: O uncle, I wish you could have said two rak'ahs (of Sunnah prayer after shorenting the Fard prayer). He said: Were I to do that, I would have completed the prayer.
[1482]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but no mention has been made of Mina, but they (the narrators) only said: He prayed while travelling.
[1483]
Ibrahim reported: I heard 'Abd al-Rahman as saying; 'Uthman led us four rak'ahs of prayer at Mina. It was reported to Abdullah b. Mas'ud and he recited: "Surely we are Allah's and to Him shall we return," and then said: I prayed with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at Mina two rak'ahs of prayer. I prayed along with Abu Bakr al-Siddiq two rak'ahs of prayer at Mina. I prayed along with 'Umar b. Khattab two rak'ahs of prayer at Mina. I wish I had my share of the two rak'ahs acceptable (to God) for the four rak'ahs.
[1484]
A hadith like this has been reported by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[1485]
Haritha b. Wahb reported: I prayed with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) two rak'abs and most of them offered two rak'ahs only in Mina, while the people felt secure.
[1486]
Wahb al-Khuza'i reported: I prayed behind the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) at Mina, and there was the greatest number of people, and they prayed two rak'ahs on the occasion of the Farwell Pilgrmage. (Muslim said: Haritha b. Wahb al-Khuza'i is the brother of 'Ubaidullah b. 'Umar son of Khattab from the side of mother.)
[1487]
Ibn 'Umar announced Adhan for prayer on a cold, windy night. Then added: Pray in your dwellings; and then said: When it was a cold, rainy night, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to command the Mu'adhdhin to say "Pray in your dwellings."
[1488]
Ibn 'Umar reported that he summoned (people) to pray on a cold, windy and rainy night, and then observed at the end of the Adhin : Pray in your dwellings, pray in your dwellings, and then said: When it was a cold night or it was raining in a journey the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) used to command the Mu'adhdhin to announce: Pray in your dwellings.
[1489]
Ibn 'Umar reported that he summoned (people) to prayer at a place (known as) Dajnan, and the rest of the hadith is the same, and then said: Pray in your dwellings, but he did not repeat for the second time words of Ibn 'Umar (Pray in your dwellings).
[1490]
Jabir reported : We set cut with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey when it began to rain. Upon this he said: He who desires may pray in his dwelling.
[1491]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported that he said to the Mu'adhdhin on a rainy day: When you have announced "I testify that there is no god but Allah; I testify that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah," do not say : "Come to the prayer," but make this announcement : "Say prayer in your houses." He (the narrator) said that the people disapproved of it. Ibn 'Abbas said : Are you astonished at it ? He (the Holy Prophet), who is better than I, did it. Jumu'a prayer is no doubt obligatory, but I do not like that I should (force you) to come out and walk in mud and slippery ground.
[1492]
'Abd al-Hamid reported: I heard 'Abdullah b. al-Harith say: 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas addressed us on a rainy day, and the rest of the hadith is the same, but he made no mention of Jumu'a prayer, and added : He who did it (who commanded us to say prayer in our houses), i.e. the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), is better than I.
[1493]
This hadith has been narrated by Ayyub and 'Asim al-Ahwal with the same chain of transmitters, but in this hadith it is not recorded : "i.e. the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[1494]
'Abdullah b. Harith reported that Ibn 'Abbas commanded the Mu'adhdhin to (summon the people to prayer on Friday and make announcement to say prayer in their houses) when it was rainy, and the rest of the hadith is the same (except this) that he said: I do not like you should walk in muddy slippery place.
[1495]
'Abdullah b. Harith reported that the Mu'adhdhin of Ibn 'Abba said Adhan on Friday (and then made the announcement to say prayer in houses) because it was a rainy day; as it has been narrated by Ma'mar and others, and in this hadith it was mentioned: He who did it, i.e. the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), was better than I.
[1496]
A hadith like this that Ibn 'Abbas ordered his Mu'adhdhin (to summon people to prayer and then make announcement to say prayer in their houses) on Friday which was a rainy day, has been transmitted by 'Abdullah b. Harith. Wuhaib, however, says that he did not hear it from him.
[1497]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say Nafl prayer on (the back of) his camel in whatever direction it took him.
[1498]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to pray on (the back of) his camel in whatever direction it took him.
[1499]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say prayer on his camel while coming from Mecca to Medina, in whatever direction his face had turned ; and its was (in this context) that this verse was revealed: "So whether you turn thither is Allah's face" (ii. 115).
[1500]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters and in the one narrated by Ibn Mubarak and Ibn Abu Za'ida (these words are narrated). Ibn 'Umar then recited: "Whether you turn thither is Allah's face," and it was revealed in this context.